" O, spirit of love, how quick and fresh art thou." William Shakespeare Caffee Riaci, Thou art romantic and fresh as the morning dew. Thou art the sweetest spot beneath the stars of yonder Palo Alto.   A loveliness to thine eyes, a  sweetness to thy senses.. Romeo, may we sit  beneath the stars and gaze upon the fine fare? O fairest Riace, none can compare. Risotto balls, lobster meatballs Osso Buco, fresh gnocchi served outdoors in a garden setting with naked- woman- holding-spilling- washing- machine fountain.  Once you sit down in the comfortable chairs beneath a heater, you can enjoy a leisurely meal  in a setting that is romantic and peaceful. The outdoor seating area is especially pleasant than most due to the naked lady holding washing machine in a fountain pool, the teeny Italian car and its partner moped at the entrance, and the  missing busy street and crowds passing by on a sidewalk cafe. A perfect location for a couple, for friends or a celebration dinner. The wait staff are friendly and the food excellent.  Hidden beside the courthouse and on the ground floor of a condo building, you might not see it driving by.  It is one of my favorite restaurants in Palo Alto and I hope the slow pace, peacefulness and fine food never changes.
Sitting outside in the perfect Palo Alto weather is a nice way to enjoy a meal.  The service was friendly, but a little too slow at times.  They did forget my soup, but that was the only mistake of the night. The burrata appetizer was amazing.  Perfect temperature and the lemon infused olive oil that they drizzled over it took it to the next level.  The other appetizers were fine, but not memorable.  They did forget my soup; however, the bottle of wine that my companions ordered was vinegary and the restaurant took it back no questions asked. My main (Osso Bucco) was not what I was expecting.  No bone marrow and it was very tomato-ey.  Almost too much so.  However, they did have gluten-free pasta which was nice. The gluten free cheesecake was ok, but not great. I'd go back just for the atmosphere.
We came here for dinner last night.  The ambiance was nice, but I was not very impressed with my food.  I had a salmon special of the day, which was a salmon filet topped with breadcrumbs and served over mushroom risotto.   It was really medicore.  The salmon was dry and overcooked and the mushroom risotto was watery and had a strong lemon flavor that I didn't really care for.  It was also seriously overpriced at $26.50.  The menu online also differs from the menu in the restaurant, which is one of my pet peeves.  My fiance had a pasta bolognese ($16.50) that he liked.   The service was pleasant but very slow. For what its worth, we had a Yelp deal ($10 for $20) and there was no problem using it even though we did not have a printout and just showed it to them on the phone. For me, I'd say it was more like 2-2.5 stars, but my fiance liked his food and the Yelp deal made it less of a rip-off so I'll round up.
Came here for a work lunch and Woweeee I was pleasantly surprised by the full frontal nude male statues!! haha And they were 15 feet tall or more! Woweeee!haha They also had a beautiful water statue of an Italian woman holding something. Beautiful! Sit outside and try to ignore the concrete building next door and you can pretend you are in Italy. Great shade umbrellas and heat lamps just in case, very comfortable surroundings. I ordered the Cioppino   clams, mussels, calamari, prawns, crab, fish of the day, crostini and it was very flavorful and enough to have left overs which i like. This is a great date place and don't bring kids....pleease. I will definitely be going back for the views! ;-)
Made OT reservations for Friday dinner before heading to a jazz concert at Stanford.  It was in a strange location next to what looked like an office building and below some apartments, but they seem to have lots of seatings, both indoors and out.  Parking is plentiful in the structure across the street. Originally, we got seated next to the fountain, which was romantic, but when it started getting windy, the water started spraying on us so we asked to sit elsewhere.  We sat next to the row of Vespas. The menu was pretty extensive.  So many great pasta choices that it was hard to make a decision.  We started off with the Sherry's salad, which was perfect portion for 2 of us to share.  It came with some fancy olives straight from Sicily and the dressing was tangy and tasty. For dinner, I ordered the Capellini Aragosta with prawns and lobster.  My husband ordered the Penne alla Siciiliana with spinach and sausage.  My dish was SOOOOO good that I was a little hesitant to give a taste to my husband!  My husband's dish was really good too that I had to ask him for a second taste.  We finished our dishes and left very satisfied.  Prices are very reasonable and it's nice that they accept Passport dining cards.  By 7, the place was packed outside and the best part was seeing a guy pull up in his Ferrari 430 Scuderia convertible and pick up like 10 orders of to-go food! Then the next day I looked at the receipt and noticed that they charged me for both entrees even though it was supposed to be BOGOF with the Passport card so I had to call the restaurant and talk to the manager.  He apologized for the error.  It was an easy fix that he reimbursed my card for the overcharge, took a photo of the receipt with his iPhone, and emailed it to me.  The food was great, so even though I had to deal with this overcharge it was handled professionally and quickly, so 5 stars for the place!  Thanks, Caffe Riace!  We'll be back again soon!
"Meh" sums it up and I really wanted to like the place.  The good news: The outdoor seating is fantastic, the wait staff was nice and the wine list is extensive. The bad news:  the food was really unremarkable, disappointing even.
So I've been here twice more in about a 5 week span, inlcuding now, which it's also really hard to write this review as I am going through a major food coma...but the food here is really top knotch in my book. Love the outdoor seating, but why the 4 stars instead of 5? The service. Last month, 4 of us went out for my birthday. They said they would bring us another umbrella, and I asked the waiter and busser as well, but my poor coworker was burning in the sun for the entire hour plus. Never did they bring us an umbrella. Ridiculous. Our waiter was also not very attentive, and it was the same waiter that gave me a hard time using the Passport Unlimited card the first time I went. Again, he made less of a fuss but pointed out he used it. If you guys have such a problem with participating in Passport, then dont! Anyways, their focaccia bread and olive tapenade was delicious as always. They don't automatically give you seconds, so you have to ask. I finally had the penne norma that everyone talks about. Normally I don't care for penne, but this dish was fabulous. The eggplant is flash fried or something, as there's not any breading as I had thought there would be, but you could tell it was fried, but not too much. I've never had fresh ricotta, and man, I was hooked after this! The whole dish was so satisfying, plus I had some leftover to take home that tasted almost as good the next day! Today, ordered the bruschetta, which was really good, but you just get 4 pieces for $6.50. There were caperberries (?) which I never had before and they were really good and complimented the bruschetta perfectly. Had the gnocchi alla sorrentino, which is my coworker's favorite dish here. The gnocchis are huge and fluffy, and I was amazed at how much fresh mozerrella cheese they add to the dish! One huge piece for every piece of gnocchi! The sauce is also really tasty, lots of garlic, and a slight hint of cream. The fresh tomatoes and basil are the last perfect added touch. Would definitley come back here again, our waiter today was very attentitve, and gave no troubles on using the passport.
I wish I took yelpers' advice and put in the address in my GPS. But no, I went with Google Maps on... Read more 
We made dinner reservations to Caffe Riace on a Friday. As soon as we arrived, we were greeted courteously and escorted to the outdoor seating area, which was simply classy and romantic with the european architectural decor. We were served complimentary bread and olive oil, which tasted great. However, I wish the bread had been warmer. My husband and I shared Melanzane all 'aceto for appetizer and Ravioli d'Agnello for entree. The food was delish and we topped off our meal with a Cannoli dessert. The waiter forgot to add Canoli to the check and when we brought it up to his attention, his immediate response was "Ok, it is on the house, how about that?". Wow, this is customer service. Love it! This was certainly was not our first visit to Caffe Riace and we definitely intend to dine again at this restaurant.
LOVE CAFFE RIACE!! This has to be my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto. My husband and I were there on a Friday evening. The restaurant itself is beautiful and romantic. It reminded me of Europe when I lived there, with the outdoor seating area. The had these really nice heating lamp warmers. The weather was so nice that we really didn't need them but still nice to have when you need them. The food was excellent and the portions were very generous.  Enough for a meal the next day. I had a salad and it was savory, and I had the salmon and it was very fresh and scrumptious. My husband had the seafood pasta and it was fabulous. The service was amazing! Our waiters name was Eduardo. He was very friendly and extremely attentive. He was constantly filling our glasses with water and making sure we had enough wine. He kept checking back on us but not to the point that it was bothersome. Another waiter brought us bread 3 times, although we didn't need it. Not a cheap restaurant but worth every penny! After all, you get what you pay for. Also, plenty of easy parking nearby or in the parking lot across the street.
It looks very nice. Love the outdoor patio with the fountain. Lots of space and many tables. Very nice. I saw the website and that's why I wanted to come here because it loooked so pretty and it really is. The service was ok. That night they had an event or something so it was really messed up. We had like 6 different waiters and they always forgot something or asked three times.. but ok. It probably isn't always like that. I wouldn't come here again. The food wasn't good. It didn't taste well. I didn't like it.. We both didn't. I had the Spaghetti Carrettiera. I only tasted lots of garlic! My partner had the chicken breast with polenta. It was better than mine but it was not worth the price.
Delicious!  Legitimate Italian, even down to the classless statue of a naked woman holding a washing machine above her head!
Waitstaff was attentive and the outdoor seating next to the fountain was very romantic and enjoyable.   Salmon was tasty and overall the food was good, but perhaps not great.   I would go back.
I recently went to Cafe Riacce with a girlfriend. I'd heard great things so I couldnt wait to try it. The service was terrible!! We had no idea who our server was, random people kept helping us because he was nowhere to be found. The food was mediocre. We shared a caesar salad which was nothing to write home about, a melanzane appetizer which was actually really good, and a special gnocchi with scallops and lobster. I saw no lobster, however and the dish was very bland. The scallops were fresh and cooked perfectly but again, nothing to write home about. This restaurant has a lot of potential. Great patio and ambiance but the service needs a boost and so does the food.
The best thing about Caffe Riace is being able to sit outside on the patio. The food in my opinion is just so-so. We came with a work group recently and it was disappointing.  The food was not good, and the service was terrible. That said, it's an extremely relaxing place to come and enjoy lunch on a beautiful day.  Just keep your expectations low.
The food was good, but oh boy, what a snobby bunch of people.  I asked someone to meet me here for a networking lunch.  The maitre d' was snobby.  The server was snobby. Fortunately, the food was actually very good (thus the two stars instead of one). Will I ever come here again?  No way...
Fine dining.  Great service.  Delicious food.  The staff was gracious, warm, and friendly, and that was before we sat down to eat. I want to go back there with my wife to treat her to a great dining experience.
It was difficult for me to figure out my rating for Caffe Riace. The atmosphere (especially the outdoor area) is a full 5 stars, and while some of the food deserves a 4-star rating, some of the entrees are only worthy of 3 stars or less. The service can range from 3 to 5 stars. Can you see why I had a hard time?! I found the caesar salad to be quite excellent...flavorful, rich and savory. Although I have tried several different entrees, I have yet to find one that was as savory as the caesar salad. I'll keep trying, though, as the beauty and calmness of the outdoor patio (often featuring a classic car parked there) is worth it.
Incredible and delicious food. Never disappointed!
We went here for an early mother's day dinner. The first thing you notice is how amazingly cute it is. The decor is great and the people are friendly and it's just a great atmosphere to be around. We ate outside and ordered the Bruschetta Linguine al Bolognese Linguine ale Vongole And three items off of the daily dinner menu All of them were amazing but the ravioli from the daily menu was the best. Topped it off with a Tiramisu and glasses of wine for my sister and mom. Their selection is dozens of pages long. On top of the food and the atmosphere, it was the service that made the experience so great. They supplied us with extra heaters because it was a little chilly and even me and my sister blankets because we were wearing dresses. Super friendly, funny, and so homey - the Italian atmosphere that they advertise. Although it's a little pricey I think they often have deals going on so I definitely recommend for a nice/cute dinner out :)
Gluten Free Pasta Available! Lights flicker on the open air patio as the sound of water flowing from the courtyard fountain sets a soothing tone.  The atmosphere is romantic - lighting is dim and moody.  It is a bit of a hidden spot - off the main street of the California Ave business district. I can't eat it any more, but if I remember correctly, the fresh bread served at the table is wonderful. I have really enjoyed many of the pastas (which they can prepare with really wonderful gluten free pasta upon request).  As a fan off eggplant, the penne alla norma and A'fontana are my favorites, but many of the menu items are delicious. For a romantic Italian meal, this would be my first choice in the area!
Love the outdoor setting, great atmosphere, great food. Beautiful restaurant, always love the greek fountain statue of a woman holding up a washing machine.  Women's repression or liberation? Definitely one of the best places to eat outdoors on the peninsula, with the enclosed courtyard with tall buildings blocking the wind, and heat lamps throughout the patio. Food, always excellent, though not cheap. Worth it though! Very fresh.
I came here with a group of about 10 people for my boyfriend's birthday back in November. They put us in a private room that was round and in general it felt a little awkward. The service was ok, although it seemed like we had to wait a long time for more bottles of wine and for our appetizers. I had some of their Bruschetta, Calamari, and The Linguine Portofino for dinner. The appetizers tasted pretty standard and the pasta dish was good. I would like to come back with a smaller group and sit outside on their patio as I think we all felt isolated in the private room and forgotten about.
I loved this restaurant. I have never been to the place or heard of it. Once I noticed the Yelp deal, I figured I would give it a shot. Its location is a little hidden from the main California downtown strip but it is easy to find. The setting is gorgeous - especially during sundown and for dinner. The meals are great and the portions are as well. Prices are a little on the high side so without the Yelp deal I would probably go with a 4 star. But I would recommend this place.
Best.Italian.Ever!
Authentic Italian cuisine, amazing wine selection, and a terrific ambiance. Caffe Riace recently... Read more 
Came in because of the yelp deal, we thought we could've just showed it on the phone as usual, but we needed a print out, fail. Going on with our lunch, Carpaccio di Brasaola e Burrata-90 day house cured Kobe beef, imported Burrata cheese- reminded me of prosciutto type texture just a little more thick and not as salty. the cheese itself was really good. I'll order it again for the cheese.. Ceppo Bolognese-freshly ground beef and pork, stewed in our pomodoro sauce- meat sauce was good, flavors were pretty good. Whole Wheat Mediterranean- Forgot the name, but something like that... shrimp and squid with olives and capers in tomato sauce- a little tangy and sweet, pretty good, light tasting. Overall, service was good. No one was at the front when I first came in, waited for a bit. We got seated outside next to the fountain, love the feel in their courtyard, though it's an odd location..
Wandered in for lunch today. Very good porcini ravioli and good service, was a little shocked because I forgot to ask how much it was...
We discovered this place a few weeks ago and liked it a lot. They offer an olive bread as an appetizer that is AWESOME. I usually don't like olives but this time... I just loved them; no sour or bitter taste. The blend in the bread was just perfect. I ordered seafood pasta which was not the best I had, but still pretty good and enjoyable. My husband had the classic carbonara and this one was very good. It was not thick / heavy to eat and he did not feel full-&-tired after finishing his plate. I will take this dish next time! Service was very nice. The waiter was a funny guy, although he must say the same jokes to all the clients.. Nonetheless it was fun :) Decoration is nice too! They have a little Italian car (a Fiat?) and some Piaggio scooters in front of the entrance. Very cliche, but it makes you laugh and it is fun to see. We will definitely come back and recommend the place.
It was a terrible meal and service. Service was non-existent and we had to repeat requests several times. The food was very late and salty. The dessert shells were stale. The white wine was not cold. The owner was impolite. It used to be good a few years back.....not now!
I recently enjoyed dinner here and I'd like to update  my review!  The service as usual is stellar right down to the plate, silverware and plate changes which occur in stealth mode. Edgar our waiter was phenomenal. His suggestions from course to course along with suggested  wine pairings right down to the dessert were impeccable. His professionalism and warm personality made our visit to cafe Riace more than a great dinner but an experience which highlighted the evening. Spinach salad with warm marinated mushrooms and pancetta was sweet and savory then secondi was clam linguini which Edgar pointed out made with fresh herbs in the garden, and finally our meat course was a beautiful lamb shank falling off the bone drenched in a stewed brown tomato sauce with potatoes and carrots.  Finally dessert was a delicious Godiva Chocolate hazelnut frozen confection which our waiter sliced into sections for us so we could experience the dessert at its optimum temperature. Wow! What a night of wonderful enchantment outdoors under the stars. Beautiful wines. We enjoyed a table next to the lit marble fountain and sculpture garden. Magic! You must visit on a warm summer night and request a table by the fountain!
I recently went back to Caffe Riace.  The service was fabulous and if for anything, this was... Read more 
Caffe Riace wouldn't accept my Yelp deal without a printed copy. The yelp deal says, verbatim, "Print out your voucher, OR redeem on your phone with the Yelp app." I showed my app but they wouldn't accept. Total B.S.. They wouldn't honor a deal that they put together. I still have my voucher.. not sure if I'm going to go back. I ended up eating there for full price. Food is mediocre at best. @Caffe Riace.. please remove the deal if you are not going to honor it. Thanks.
I love everything about this place. I've been coming here for years now. It's top choice for family gatherings and celebrations. I had my wedding here last June and it was beyond fabulous! The set up was so beautiful and the service was unbeatable. It poured rain all morning and the staff rushed to dry the patio and set up large tents in record time. I must commend them for doing such an excellent job, the result was absolutely stunning! PS The cannelloni is out of this world!!
I went here with a group of my friends. All the foods were amazing. We drank beers and wines. Great atmosphere. Waiter was excellent. -Robin
I have eaten here before for dinner and it was pretty good. I'll tell you- you are paying for the beautiful environment - but I would not recommend to order the food for take out...or you will be disappointed. Yelp had a deal where you can get $20 for $10, so I bought it and placed and order to go. I mentioned I had the yelp deal, ok- no problem, just bring it in.  My lunch came out to be 20.00 something after taxes, but when I got there- they said it has to be 20 before taxes so I had to add a salad. They initially declined the Yelp deal saying it wasn't valid for take out. But I stated firmly that it doesn't say that anywhere on the voucher...so anyway, they made an exception. The seafood pasta I got was mediocre- They substituted mussels for shrimp at no additional cost which was nice of them. I had to add salt and chili pepper to taste anything and the salad that I had to order to make it $20 pre tax... is prob the worst salad I've ever had. First of all, it was hardly a salad- in terms of ... there was not much there, it didn't even cover the bottom surface of the container. Almost every single leaf was wilted and brown along the edges (not fresh) and every piece was bitter. I know there are some types of leaves that are bitter- but these ones were not the bitter-type. I think they were just old, I mean they were soft to the touch- salad is supposed to be crisp. Anyway, I didn't eat the salad and like I said the pasta was unimpressive. If you eat here, make sure you dine in... at least you get the nice environment, and the bread.
Really nice outdoor patio, pretty good food and service, a bit of an odd location but easy parking.
This place is randomly located off the main area of Palo Alto next to central.  It was hard to locate but once located there was plenty of parking. The food there after much consideration, is terrible.  I really dread rating restaurants as terrible since they are a home/mom-pop business but it is from my perspective. The food there is flavorless (we went there two times and won't be coming back) and when the food there is cooked poorly there is an excuse.  I forget what we ordered but when the server told us how we liked our food, we told him, "the chicken is a bit rough tasting" and instead of trying to fix it, he replies, "chicken is meat you can't mess with you have to cook it very well".  Well, that's great for home cooking but NOT for a nice dining restaurant!  We were completely turned off with this restaurant by then. On top of everything else, we came with a google offer coupon, pay $15 or something to that effect and get $30 worth of food.  We have purchased living social/groupon/google offer coupons to try places out and never have we been FORCED to give 18% gratuity unless it specifies on the coupon. This place is unfortunately one of them. We didn't bother arguing with the person since I'm sure there would be another excuse.  We have filed a complaint with google offers.  I am being nice to give this place 2 stars but honestly the food was tolerable (not where it was inedible).  If you want tolerable food and to be forced to give 18% gratuity this place is for you.
My husband and I visited Caffe Riace on a Friday night in February.  After seeing their adorable outside eating area, I was a bit disappointed that it was too cold to dine outside. Caffe Riace is broken down into two or three smaller rooms to give the illusion of a small caffe.  The atmosphere was cozy and intimate. The menu informs patrons that Caffee Riace serves its customers in the traditional Italian style. Patrons are encourage to savor each course, enjoy the company of their fellow diners, and linger as long as they wish.  Should you be in a hurry, you are encouraged to let your waiter know.  Our waitress was pleasant, prompt and polite. Caffe Riace has a ginormous wine list, with the majority only being available for purchase by the bottle. My husband and I shared the caparese salad for our appetizer.  The mozzarella was fresh, creamy, and delicious.  For our entrees my husband had the sausage and potatoes and I had the saltimbocca.  My entree included fried polenta with gorgonzola and broccolini.  Typically I find broccolini too bitter, however these were cooked perfectly. Overall we had a great experience at Caffe Riace and hope to return soon.
Went there recently and loved the ambience, but all of the 6 people in our group were unimpressed with the food. I did want to go back just for the courtyard, so I called to see if they had happy hour. The man chastised me and said they don't have a bar. Whoops. He didn't have to be rude about it, though. And let's be honest, having a happy hour would allow customers to come without having to eat their bland food.
Pleasantly surprised when I went here for the first time tonight. The service was slow, but there is... Read more 
Summary:  Great food but a little overpriced in this economy. We had a fairly extravagant multi-course anniversary meal with a bottle of wine, and paid dearly. The food and wine were great, though.  The atmosphere on a warm fall evening was perfect. We vowed that next time we would stick to the more reasonably priced pasta dishes rather than the entrees.  They looked fantastic and there were large portions. Remember that this restaurant is 90% outside in the patio, so you should check the weather before you go here.  They do have propane space heaters.  Then when they lit the tiki lights we could see our food again. The other thing to point out is that most of the 2-top tables are around the fountain.  Romantic, sure.  Until you realize how noisy that fountain is and you are forced to yell back and forth at each other to have a conversation.
This is an excellent restaurant. Yes, when jammed, can be a little slow, but homemade sausage, slow cooked lamb shank, fresh swordfish or their pasta of the day are terrific. The Carruba family has mutiple restaurants. You will see care and flair for a night in Sicily. The patio is prime in summer... the small dining rooms are intimate but you will see 'regulars' there all the time. A hidden gem. Enjoy the personal experience. Perfect for a group dinner, or a business meeting at a corner table.
We have heard about Caffe Riace and just walked in one evening.  They were packed so they could not have seated us but offered very generously to call other restaurants to make sure we find a good place to eat.  I was really impressed by this. Surely we went back this time with reservation.  Food was great and service even better.  We had Linguine Portofino and Pappardelle alla Michelangelo. Last night we went there for the third time again to celebrate  a birthday.  They gave us a whole room for ourselves and we ended up having a private party without even asking for it.  Again, service was great and all four of us loved our food.  Pasta and fish dishes were all great.  Highly recommend for warm and sincere service and good food.
Last Sunday, I went with several of the youngest, most attractively vibrant and vital theatre aficionados West of the Mississippi to Caffe Riace for a post-theatre dinner discussion. Youth is a relative term.  Given that the age of the average theatre-goer I've met in the past few decades is seventy-five, my whole bunch of theatre Droogies are barely more than Babes in Arms - all but two are under sixty, and there's actually one (moi) who's still in his forties.  Being the youngest guy in the room always puts a spring in my step and a song in my heart, so I was definitely ready for a good dinner, and Caffe Riace did not disappoint. First up, the ambiance is amazing.  Dining on the patio at Caffe Riace, eating fabulous Italian cuisine surrounded by artistic fountains creates an atmosphere that normally can only be experienced dining between buildings in the heart of Florence, Rome, or Orvieto. We were seated at a large round table (to enhance the post-theatre discussion) far enough away from the fountain so that it wouldn't drown out the conversation, but close enough to allow us to enjoy the visuals.  Giuseppe Carrubba, the owner, saw to our group personally, providing recommendations as needed, and ensured that our complete experience was exceptional.  Thank you, Giuseppe! After studying the expansively impressive wine list for a leisurely moment or four, I ordered and tasted a bottle of the 2004 Barbera.  It was very well balanced, slightly tart, with a medium body and tannins a shade lower then medium - a good pairing for some fine Italian cuisine.   Giuseppe poured for the wine drinkers at the table, then (at my request) opened a second bottle to let it breath for a bit. My first course was the Bruschetta; it was excellent.  The tomatoes were fresh, the melted cheese was good and the bread was light (but not too light) and crisp.  The second bottle of Barbera was poured, and after a brief glance at the blissful expressions on the faces of my wine-drinking Droogies, I asked Giuseppe to crack a third bottle. Our entrees arrived.  I had the Salsiccia Alla Siciliana - Caffe Riace's homemade sausage topped with sauteed roasted bell peppers and garlic.  It was heavenly!  The third bottle of wine was poured just as the discussion turned from our respective vacations to the play ("Fly By Night"). We had one of our best-ever theatre discussions.  Afterwards, I found that I had already written most of my "Fly By Night" Yelp in my head.  Maybe it was the atmosphere, or the food, or both combined with the company - do you think it might also have had something to do with the three bottles of wine we drank, followed by that fabulous '76 Port Giuseppe suggested for dessert? Naah!! Even if you're the designated driver (and it was a good thing we had more than one) Caffe Riace is a fabulous, five-star dining experience, with exceptional food and impeccable service.  I heartily recommend it, with or without theatre.
Love this place. The food was good, not outstanding(well, I have better italian food some place else), and the service and the atmosphere are wonderful. A good 4.5 stars restaurant. A must try if you are around this area.
Outdoor seating was magical.  Service was fun and professional.Food quite good
Caffe Riace is tucked between residential buildings. Maybe retirement centers as the crowds were mostly matured? Lovely outdoor space adorned with a couple of huge naked men statues and a fountain in the middle. The water comes out of a woman holding a coined washer. Come for the ambiance on a warm evening.  Chill, enjoy some wine, but dial your expectation low on the food. Sausage was bland, and pasta was sub par to Pasta Pomodoro or Pasta? What we had: Carpaccio di Brasaola e Burrata 90 day house cured Kobe beef, imported Burrata cheese 14 Salsiccia alla Siciliana homemade sausage, organic bell peppers, onion and potato 18 Ceppo Riace tube pasta, mushrooms, sausage, fresh tomato, garlic, white wine 18 Amaretto Bread Pudding
On a warm summer evening, this is a nice place to eat outdoors. I will probably return once per year just for that. But, the menu is ridiculously limited. Outside of pasta there were only 4 main entrees. And one of the entrees was a sausage dish. And the pasta dishes were more limited than most Italian restaurants. We had Cannelloni and a pasta with sausage. Both were sort of dull. Not bad, just not worth coming for. I'm hoping the owners read this and offer more menu items and food that makes you want to come back.
Came here for lunch with a coworker. It's a very cute lil outdoor restaurant. Had the Chicken Parmigiana (which I was able to customize since it came with veggies and polenta, but I preferred pasta, so they substituted the polenta with pasta with no extra charge.. big +) My coworker had the Bolognese. He said it was pretty good. It was a pretty big portion. The chicken was cooked just right. It was still juicy. They provided just the right amount of tomato sauce. I hate when some places don't pour enough and there's too much cheese. The service was great! Our waiter was very nice. Made sure we were treated and served well. I'd come back here. I was tempted with the specials.
Love this family style restaurant with good old fashion "make you feel like you're eating at a friend's home with Giuseppe, one of the owners checking to make sure our every desire is met.  They have indoor seating but you will want to eat outside as it's so nice and charming.  Plenty of heaters and blankets to keep you warm should you need it.  Fountains and statues add to the charm. Food is good and plentiful.  Will definitely be returning!
it's been a long time since eating at Riace and after this recent experience it will not happen again if I can help it. The food comes from a conveyor belt; the calamari dish had a blob of mayonnaise which had already changed color on the outside from having been set on the plate many hours before I ordered the food. And after telling the waiter that I wanted to wait before ordering my second course he told me that "they have a system" and they'll wait until I finished my first course before bringing out the second. Sure enough, the second plate arrived while I was half way through the first course and it was not what I had ordered, so they had to send it back and replace it. pasta was quite overcooked because everything is prepared in advanced and probably reheated when one orders it
Took 4 friends and sat outside lord love a duck beautiful day started with bubbles finished with port food was good service was also good. I choose a couple of things I love have heard others say good not great but I surrender to a couple of servers who give great advice
I have had 3-4 good runs in a row. usually Joe hosts us and the servers are great. The last two... Read more 
Good atmosphere and okay service.  The salad was small and nothing special.  The cannelloni was the highlight of the evening and would return just for the pasta.  While it is mostly outdoor seating there are plenty of heaters for warmth.  Good place for patio dinning. Recommend a few more Chardonnay on the wine list.
Came here with a friend for dinner on a Friday night and it was great. The outdoor seating area was really nice -- you're surrounded by interesting statues. Even though the patio was almost full, it wasn't loud at all. My friend and I really liked what we had -- gnocchi and Pasta Norma. I would recommend them both. (The Pasta Norma was so good that I tried to recreate it at home.) Our waiter was great about helping us choose wine to go with our meals. I would recommend this restaurant and would come back again.
Came here early on a Saturday night with my friend Erin before a movie at Palo Alto Square. Easy parking across the street, and we were seated right away without a reservation...maybe because it was a Holiday weekend before 6:00 pm. Our table was in a quiet spot in the delightful patio. The waiter was helpful without hovering, and knew the specials and the wine list. He offered a "splash" of the one we chose so we could see if we enjoyed it. The generous bowl of minestrone (soup of the day) was excellent, though maybe a little cool, totally fresh and full of al dente vegetables. Bread was light and tasty. We decided to share the salmon, which was a large portion, perfectly cooked in a tomato artichoke sauce. It came with vegetables and two of the risotto balls that I had been eying in the appetizer menu. He offered coffee and dessert, but didn't push it. Definitely will return.
Came here for a business lunch. Nice outdoor patio, but there are indoor tables too if it's too sunny outside. Vintage Vespas everywhere, and a Fiat 600 in the corner. Sounds like a recipe for disaster, except the food was actually pretty good, and despite the admonition on the menu that "we run on Italian time", the food came out pretty quickly. Located a block from my office, I'm sure I will be back.  Actually came back the following day around 3:30pm hoping to grab a coffee/tea (with a name like Cafe Riacce I assumed it is an actual cafe) but they said they only open at 5pm.  I would fix that if I were you...
This restaurant brings out the bipolar in me. First, it's one of my favorite Friday lunch spots.  Grab the girls and sit beneath a hunky naked man, drinking luscious wine and eating scrumptious Italian food.  The naked man is one of the several unique statues that adorn this lovely outdoor dining spot.  A little wine, chatty girl talk and local gossip is the best in this sun-filled patio! Then there's the more subdued side of me that spent hours on a Saturday with Hubby lazily enjoying the fresh appies and delicious wine.  It was a slow day for Riace and the servers let us wander to the pool behind the gate with our drinks and dangle our feet in to cool water.  Peaceful and romantic. Either way, Riace is the perfect place for a Friday chick chat or a romantic, lazy Saturday afternoon. TIP: Street parking is sparse so head to the lot across the street.
Fabulous outdoor seating with ambience - 2 stars. Good selection of Italian wine - 1 star. We had communication problems with out waiter. He didn't bring the first wine we asked for and poured more glasses of the expensive second wine than we asked for too quickly for us to stop him. Also, the food here is average at best. I can make better pasta at home with Safeway brand products. Why does pasta with meat sauce cost $18? Lastly, if there are 2 people dining and they order a bruschetta appetizer, you don't bring them only 3 pieces of toast!!! At $8, do you think you could actually put 4 tiny pieces of toast on the plate so that there doesn't have to be a discussion about who can have the last one? TOTAL FAIL! For f*ck's sake people! When I spend $60 on dinner, I shouldn't have to b*tch about these kinds of things. It's a good thing this place has the best outdoor seating in town...
I came here as per a friend's recommendation and it was kind of interesting spot I thought might be a hidden gem (it's in a converted apartment unit, not as a sketchy as it sounds) I was happy to see a Yelp deal so I got it. The food was so-so, ordered two pastas that were so unmemorable that I don't even know what they were. The service was okay and the portions were big.
The Background: Interesting restaurant that is primarily outdoors.  It is beautiful for a lunch place, but I am not sure how nice it would be on cold or windy nights.  The restaurant has a nice patio area but has extremely limited indoor seating. The Positives: The food here is quite good.  I went with a group of friends for a birthday celebration and the wait staff was friendly and helpful.  In addition, the atmosphere is quite nice given the open relaxed feel of the outdoor area. The Negatives: I am not sure what happened but they brought out a Tiramisu for the birthday girl.  While that is pretty standard, it was pretty strange that they charged us for it even though we did not order it.
1. Ambiance - 5 2. Food - 5 3. Service - 4 4. Price - 3.5 The Ambiance is absolutely awesome, with seating around a water fountain that they have in their courtyard. Food was delicious - Had the special of the day - Meat Lasagna. A bit on the pricey side - But hey - you get what you pay for right.
Fresh pasta, fresh fish, fresh clams: great flavors. Looking forward to trying out more dishes.
Not sure why this place is only 3.5 stars. Great place, and the pasta is to die for, ask for the home-made hot sauce too.
Didn't like this place much.. The food was so-so and the service seemed officious. Its not the worst but surely wouldn't go there again
The service is great. The food is properly prepared and served quickly. The tiramisu is the best I have ever had. I am not usually big on Italian food but this place really changed my mind. The tables are cozy perfect for a datenight. I live in cupertino so I definetly think its worth the drive.
The boyfriend took me here last night for Christmas Even dinner, and it was a very pleasant experience. We had reservations at 6pm and was promptly seated inside. The host was very outgoing and friendly. The ambiance inside was super nice- it's dim and quiet, very suited for a romantic dinner or a small family dinner. The inside is small and filled up pretty fast; by 6:30pm (on a Saturday night) there was only 3-4 empty tables. But it never got too noisy or anything. We ordered the antipasto riace for an appetizer that had bruschetta, pepperoni arrostiti (bell peppers), and caprese; the boyfriend had veal and I had a seafood pasta. (Can't remember the names, sorry!) Everything was super delicious and the whole experience was great. The servers were very attentive, and would always come by every so often to make sure we were "happy." It was on the pricey side a little bit, but you get what you pay for, right? I would definitely recommend this restaurant for an anniversary or special occasion. Great place to celebrate something nice with your significant other.
3-stars for the food... plus 1 star for the adorable outdoor ambiance! The boyfriend's mom gave us a groupon to Caffe Riace, and I was super excited because I love trying new restaurants. This place is in a random/hidden part of Palo Alto, so I probably wouldn't have thought to come here otherwise. Appetizer- aged Carpaccio Ummm, wasn't a fan. The carpaccio was drowned in too much oil and it didn't quite hit the spot... Pasta Entree- Linguini Vongole (this is why I gave the food 3 stars- yum!) Between the appetizer, my boyfriend's steak entree, and this linguini... can we say, WINNER!!? If it weren't for this dish, I would give the food 2-stars and probably not want to come back. The clams were perfectly cooked with the right amount of garlic (love garlic). They even cooked EXTRA clams in the linguini! I was worried the only clams I would get were the ones perfectly-placed around the rim of my plate. This entree was so good, I actually finished it all! Although the boyfriend did sneak a few forks full of clams & linguini to make up for his overcooked steak. We all know italian portions are fairly large, and is usually tossed into a togo box on the way out, but not this entree! I'd come back just for this pasta dish Dessert- Cannoli Perfect to share with another person. It was really good, and I don't usually order desserts. I loved the crunch factor it had :) Server- Edgar, extremely friendly and attentive. Although the overall service was slow in general... is that an Italian thing? Just don't come here if you're in a rush. Sit back and relax, my friend. Ambiance- AMAZING! We sat right next to the fountain and enjoyed the romantic night lights overhead, adorable mini cooper, and colorful vespas parked beside us. It's perfect for intimate dates or a night out with your best girlfriend to just catch up on this week's gossip. Make sure to bring a jacket, it could get chilly... if not, they provide clean blankets!
The food here is *terrific*!  My cannelloni was wonderful, as were the risotto ball appetizers my friends and I ordered, the caesar salad, and the tiramisu.  We also loved the easy parking, the wonderful ambiance outside, and the funky (well, funky for Palo Alto) decor. There were two things, however, that we did *not* love, and there were significant enough to dock them a full star.  First, our waiter was on some kind of upper.  He was manic/hyper/giddy/flirtatious when we arrived and when he seated us and took our orders.  During our actual meal, he disappeared for a solid 30 minutes (after taking my friend's wine order and not bringing it).  When he came back, he looked a little wrecked.  He was still acting bizarre and giddy, but in an oh-my-God-I'm-coming-down-from-a-giant-trip sort of way.  It took a LONG time for him to take our dessert order, and an even longer time for him to bring us the check.  Secondly, the coffee was horrible.  No amount of milk or sugar could save it. Aside from these two kind-of-big problems, though, the place was really great.  The food was marvelously good, and less expensive than I'd feared (just under 20/entree).  I hope to come back.
I was there last Friday for dinner with ex-coworkers. I made reservation for 10 people and we got a room by ourselves. This place is really hidden and away from downtown Palo Alto or El Camino so you better use your GPS or navigation system to find your way. They have street parking and garage parking across the street. When we where there for dinner, it was hard to find the restaurant especially you only see business offices around that area. The waiter we had was so friendly and entertaining. Our friend order a pasta which cheese which he is allergic and he replaced a new pasta for free. He suggested the anti-pasta which was great while we waited for friend who is coming in late from LA. I had the seafood pasta which was ok and nothing special or bad about it. Overall a good experience and recommended if you want to stay away from busy University ave in Palo Alto with less parking headache.
Love this place and I really don't come here often enough for how good it is. My g/f and I last came here about 7 years ago and had a great wine (sorry, not gonna say what it was because they only have one or two bottles left). FWD to last Friday and me browsing through the wine list...what do I see? The same wine. Cellar stored so it's still perfect. I had brought a bottle and we had already opened it ($25 corkage fee btw -- but if you order a bottle it's waived obviously) because it took me a solid 20 minutes to find the wine. Luckily the bottle I brought was good so we polished it off before our dinner even arrived and ordered the old one we loved. Owner stopped by to say hi, our waiter was pretty funny and more than helpful, and the Sommelier was friendly. One weird thing that happened twice was while my g/f was talking to the waiter; this girl (maybe a waitress or buss girl) came in and interrupted him. She never acknowledge us or said excuse me. It was very noticeable, rude, and happened twice. I almost said something but we were still having fun so I let it go. The food was just as I remembered it, homemade and delicious. We started with the lightly fried Risotto mozzarella balls (OMG!!), had a spinach salad (which we didn't actually order but it was on the house), Got the cannelloni for dinner, and finished it off w/ some Tiramisu. Everything was fantastic. What else can I say? If you've been here you know how cool of a setting the outside is, the waiter gave my g/f a blanket after it got a little chilly and that was that. Go, relax, have fun, and enjoy some quality Italian/Sicilian food!
My bf and I went there just looking for some good Italian food and we certainly found it!! The location is definitely off the beaten path and you wouldn't find it easily unless you were looking for it. There is a parking lot available so parking was not a problem. We did not have a reservation, for a Thursday evening, we didn't expect to need one. I would imagine that on a weekend or special occasions, you would want to be sure to make a reservation to be seated. There was a lot of available outdoor seating, as well as a small indoor seating area. When you enter, there is a vespa and a vintage Mini, setting the atmosphere. The service was excellent and our waiter was knowledgeable and attentive. Top notch type of place, my waiter pulled out my chair and always served me first. We were not sure what to expect, so we just came in casual clothes and were very under-dressed. There is *not* a place for flip flops! ;) They had an extensive wine list, and although the menu was limited - the food was excellent.  The flavor was great, everything was spiced appropriately and cooked to perfection! Yay!
I've been looking for an elegant Italian restaurant without terrible food for a long time.  After years of false starts, I'd almost given up when we discovered Caffe Riace. We initially had a hard time finding this restaurant, as it is tucked away from the rest of the action on California.  But, once there, we discovered that this restaurant had an intimate setting -- as well as an interesting fountain with an ancient Roman front-loading washer sculpture (you'll see when you get there what I mean).  It's been rather cold recently, so both of the times we've been here, we've decided to sit inside where there are only a handful of tables (the outside patio area has heat lamps, but those don't help against blustery winds). The complimentary bread is nice to start with, but we were intrigued by the arancine siciliane: risotto balls, filled with fresh mozzarella and peas.  This sounded like the fried rice balls filled with cheese and tomato sauce that we were familiar with along the side streets of Rome ("suppli").  As it turns out, they're practically the same thing (with the arancine being the Sicilian version).  This is definitely a satisfying way to start off the meal! My favorite dish here, bar none, is the linguini tutto mare (the seafood pasta dish).  At most restaurants, this dish would be an excuse to dump old seafood into an overwhelmingly spiced heavy cream sauce before tossing it with cheap pasta.  Not here!  The shrimp is delicate and not pedestrian.  The rings of squid are tender with just enough springiness.  The mussels and clams have just a bit of brininess and add a splash of pizzazz to the presentation.  But, each time that I've had this dish, the star has been the large, generous chunks of fish.  The sauce is light, the pasta is perfect, and I can't recommend this dish enough! As for dessert, while the cannoli wasn't particularly impressive, the semi-freddo was a definite hit.  Another great choice for dessert is the tiramisu. All in all, your pocketbook is going to end up a bit lighter at the end of the meal... but, for such excellent Italian food, it's definitely worth it!
Visited this lovely restaurant with a friend from out of town. The restaurant itself is absolutely gorgeous. We were seated, given water and delicious bread by a young man, and that's when things went downhill. Our server Violet, was not very personable, nor competent. She gave us a brief rundown of the specials, could not make a suggestion for a wine to pair with our meal and disappeared for long stretches of time. Our food was brought out by another server, our drinks refilled by the same server and Violet was nowhere to be found.... That was until my friend went to the restroom and saw Violet intently surfing the Internet on her cell phone.  I also want to mention, when she returned from her long periods of being gone, she reeked of alcohol. Perhaps this is one of the reasons she is incompetent. There is a problem when the server is getting more to drink than the paying guest, When dining at an establishment of this caliber, a certain level of service is expected. Violet fell ridiculously short. The food was delicious, however the abysmal service put a serious damper on the evening. If the owners expect their business to continue in this struggling economy, they may want to assess this situation. There are many people who would love to have a job and actually provide service , not less than the bare minimum and spend time doing their job, not on their phone.   I would hate for servers such as this to ruin this little gem of a restaurant. Hopefully, the owners and/or manager reads Yelp and listens to their customers. I'm sure this is not an isolated event.
Looking for a classy and romantic dinner in the Palo Alto - Mountain View area at 9 PM on a Saturday might result in few options. My lovely lady and me found Caffe Riace late on a Saturday night, an hour before closing. We wanted a delicious meal with a good wine pairing.  Since both of us rarely drink wine, they could have fed us 2-Buck Chuck and we wouldn't have known.  Instead, they recommended great wines for the bruschetta appetizer, and entrees of Spaghetti Carrettiera and Penne Norma. Admittedly, I wanted a dish with some meat, but decided to go with these two vegetarian entrees since my girlfriend is vegetarian.  These entrees rocked my world! The spaghetti was clearly homemade with its rich and artisanal texture.  The sauce was simple with just olive oil, parmesan cheese, and red pepper flakes.  I could've eaten 2 pounds of this stuff. Then Penne Norma came with homemade penne and fried eggplant.  Dude, this eggplant is crazy good.  Fry anything, and I'll eat it.  Fry eggplant like Caffe Riace, and you'll think it was a dream. The wines included a chardonnay, riesling, and cabernet. The waiter was super nice and joked a lot.  A great experience on a Saturday night!
http://www.cafferiace.co... Earns the infamous "Death 1 Star" and deserves it. My companion and I ate at Caffe Riace last evening.  We will never be going back.  Mediocre food, extremely poor service, and very high prices are the reason. We eat out often, and decided to splurge at an upscale restaurant.  A friend of my wife's recommended Caffe Riace so we gave it a shot. It is located in basically a courtyard of a condominium/office complex.  All tables are outdoors.  The setting is really pretty.  Lots of trees and plants accompanied by large Greek like statues with one including flowing water.  We arrived at 5pm and promptly got seated. The evening was beginning to get cool, so we requested the heat lamp be lit.  The hostess complied and directed one of the busboys to fire one up which he did. We were then seated. We waited over 5 minutes before the waiter showed up.  Now, because of the hour, there were only 3 tables with patrons. Finally, he showed up, and by that time the heat lamp had gone out. We politely asked him to get it re-lit as we looked at the wine list. The breeze picked up and my wife was getting cold. The busboy came back 7 minutes later and re-lit the heat lamp.  As we proceeded, the lamp went out again.  So, instead of having a nice conversation in the setting, we are focused on the lamp going out and my wife and I getting cold.  I finally have to walk up to the hostess, and explain the situation and ask for the lamp to be checked or replaced.  The busboy comes back in 5 min.  and actually gives us a look like we are bothering him.  He attempts to relight the heat lamp, and I just tell him by then to replace it. What a terrible start to a dinner.  The busboy brings another heat lamp over, attempts to light it.  He finds out that it is out of propane.  He has to replace the propane. Finally, after having been sitting down for 20 minutes, he gets a heat lamp going that actually works. Now to the dinner.  The by-the-glass wine list only had one Italian wine on it in the Red section along with a CA merlot. We ordered the Italian which turned out to be mediocre along with the rest of our experience. The waiter was very non attendant to the table. Finally, he comes back to take our order.  Prices were in the high range.  My wife orders the $26.95 lamb shank, and I the $21.95 pasta with Bolognese sauce. The meals arrive and we begin to eat.  Taste was mediocre at best, nothing special, and certainly not warranting these prices. We, are by then, really disappointed. Finally, we order tea. It takes 5+ more minutes to get here.  We sat there for 15 minutes with the waiter or busboy never returning asking if we wanted a refill.  No dessert for us, as by then we just want to get out of there. Of course, I have to flag down the waiter asking for the bill.  Put my credit card on top, wait another longer than normal time period until he returns and finally get the bill,. I sign the credit card statement and we leave chalking this one up as "Never Again!" Even taking away the heat lamp issues, the food was really non-descript for the prices, and the service was horrible. We have eaten at many fine restaurants at this price range and above, and Caffe Riace does not deserve to be in that type of class.
Nice, interesting decor.  Makes me think it'd be a cool place to have a wedding reception. The cannelloni is very good, but the gnocchi is not.  Also love their fresh salads, including the Sicilian and the Spinach.  Definitely a hidden gem.
Seriously, for the price they can do so much better, especially considering the other Italian Restaurants that are in the area. The only thing worth the price is the Mozarella. Overrated, overpriced, & overtly pretentious.
This place is FANTASTIC if you're looking for a small and intimate place to have a lovely dinner.  All outdoor seating ...you almost forget that you are between a large office building and an apartment complex.  A gem of a place when the evening weather is nice and warm.  I do wonder though what they do on nights when its not so nice or when it rains. Anyway onward to the food...food was good but nothing to die for.  You almost don't care because the setting is so nice.  I would however recommend the cannelloni pasta...rich and decedent and the portion enough that you'd want to share. Service was good...they take their time there which means I wouldn't recommend this place if you are in a rush.
I always forget about Caffe Riace but today, when the sun was shining, spring was in the air, the thought of going to Italy entered my consciousness and I remembered it is just a few minutes away. Easy parking across the street in a covered parking structure, no fee, and being greeted by a smiling maitre-d who shook my hand and said in earnest, "good to see you again sir and welcome back."  Did he really remember me.. .I hope so. Lunch, al fresco.  A waiter named Giussepe (a consummate pro from San Francisco's finest we were later informed) was the main attraction as he read our minds, helped us order properly, and  was so efficient and effusive that we felt totally taken care of... and pampered.  Not rushed.  Not interrupted, either. The antipasto was a perfect noontime meal, including the Riace antipasti, grilled polenta with gorgonzola hidden inside, and burrata, creamy and fresh, with luscious Kobe carpaccio that melted in my mouth. It wasn't just presented, it was served to us by our 5 star waiter who knew what to do and then, as a surprise, he drizzled homemade balsamic on a circle around our plates, that had been reduced to a luscious, black sweetness to complement the peppers, eggplant, arugula and capers. It was impossible not to take their crusty Italian bread (never sour dough!) and swab all the juices on our plates! That's not all, this gorgeous patio, with fountains, music, statuary and happy customers was a return again to Italy, without traveling more than a few minutes... how lucky for us here on the Peninsula to have a GEM like this! Yes, next time I will think about Caffe Riace before I forget it in this melting pot of average restaurants on the Peninsula. This place stands out and deserves to be given 5 stars.  Be sure to ask for Giusseppe, the waiter extraordinaire. Buon apetito!
We went on a Tuesday night, early, about 5:30pm.  No one else there, we sat inside near the kitchen.  Amazing service, the wine suggested was delicious and our Host gave us a glass on the house.  We had the nightly specials; Veggie lasagna (YUM) and the Pappardelle with chicken, porcini mushrooms, tomatoes and cream sauce.  Also delish. Had the tartuffi and the tiramisu for dessert.  Bruschetta for app. Just a really lovely time.  I will come back and try the outdoor courtyard.
Great food amidst a most unusual decor---if you like larger-than-life naked statues of the male figure.  It's nestled between two buildings; you almost might miss it.  But this little gem serves consistently delicious meals and they love to pair their plates with wine.  Be adventurous and ask to try something new. Times visited: 5+
We discovered Caffe Riace at what must have been its peak (2003?); since then, we have had unpredictable experiences every time we return.  Some good, some not so good.  But we still go, hoping the next roll of the dice will be a winner. Our first meal at Riace was so much more than just a meal.  It was almost magical -- it was surreal, like being transported to a little town in Sicily.  We were seated in a little outdoor cove of the courtyard that only served to enhance the illusion of narrow hill-town streets.  The service was slow, but deliberately so, allowing each of us to enjoy each others' company, conversation, wine, and the atmosphere of the courtyard behind us.  Our waiter was delightful, speaking a little Italian, recommending good wines from their extensive cellar, arranging with the kitchen a custom-made caprese for us.  In short, it was perfect. But each of these essential elements have slowly eroded away over the past three years.  It seems like they have made efforts over the past three years to grow beyond their means.  Some staff have appeared who must have been hired for the depth of their cleavage rather than the depth of their wine knowledge.  The staff are busy with too many tables to deliver that unique, devoted attention we enjoyed.  In short, they seem to have compromised some of their core principles in the name of growth.  With the right waiter, though, the service is still great, and worthy of return visits. The food has always been good, if a little expensive.  I almost always order the Osso Buco or lamb shank whenever they have them, and have never been unimpressed.  I've always thought the Caffe Riace experience is 40% food, 30% service, and 30% atmosphere, so it helps to remember you are paying for not only the freshly-made pasta on your plate, but also the courtyard, the fountains and scuptures that accompany it. In short, I wish Caffe Riace would pull back the reigns just a little, and return some of the charm it had several years ago.  Hire a few more Italian waiters, give some more personal attention, and make each and every visit as lovely as the first -- and you'll find me back there a couple times a month rather than twice a year.
This place rocks in the summer time... HELLO! outdoor dining (aka al fresco).  The wine list is great.  The food is great.  The only little quibble is the bathroom which you always have to wait for because there is ONE. Go on a warm night, with good friends and catch up.  You are not rushed and you feel relaxed and contented.  This restuarant is family owned and operated.  You are a member and a guest.  Enjoy!
My coworkers and I came here for lunch one afternoon.  I was initially excited, because the place looks really nice....the decor and vibe is very European garden-cafe-esque.  It was pretty chilly the day that we went, so while we could have eaten outside under the heat lamps, we opted to be seated indoors.  The indoor seating was pretty cool as well - we were inside a little house, and we got seated in our own private room! Things quickly went sour from there, however.  It took 20 minutes before anyone even came in to bring us water, and another 15 for the waiter to come and take our order.   Another half an hour goes by before they bring our appetizer.  By this point, I was totally regretting only having a tic-tac for breakfast.   We got the bruschetta, which was ok, but definitely not worth the wait.  Then, it took another 45 for our entrees to come out - and in the interim, no one even came in to take away our empty appetizer plates or refill our drinks! For my meal I got the gnocchi with marinara sauce and mozzarella cheese. Again, it was just ok, nothing marvelous - in fact it was kinda bland.  Totally disappointing, especially considering how I heard everyone raving about how good the food is here.  The worst part is that as I was voraciously digging through my meal - I FOUND A BLACK CURLY HAIR!  Totally disgusting.  Now, no judging, but at this point I was so frickin hungry that I pushed the hair aside and kept digging in (I know, I'm disgusting).  After making my way through some more gnocchi, I came across ANOTHER hair.  Was somebody shaving their head above the gnocchi pot??  I had already lowered my standards and looked past the first hair, but I could not do it again.  I didn't finish the rest of my meal. And in case you're wondering - no, I didn't tell the waiter about the hair.  Why?  Because we couldn't find him.  He never came back to check on us after our food was dropped off.  We had to go out and look for him to get our check.  So, I figured rather than complain to them about the hair, I would just go and yelp about it, and NEVER EVER return to this over-priced, low quality place again.  I have never had such bad/slow service in my life, and the last time I found hair in my food was in a truck stop diner.  I think that says something about Caffe Riace.
Caffe Riace's seats diners outdoors in what is a very prettily decorated patio area with attractive potted plants serving as decoration. We had an extreeemely long wait.  As we sat waiting for our server to take our orders, I felt completely out of place, as I was surrounded by rich, 30+ year old, white people, all drinking glasses of wine.  It was discomforting, but I decided to just grimace and bear it, since I was hoping the food would make it worth the pain.  Big mistake. The server finally came by to ask if we'd like to see the wine list.  Wine, my ass... I'm not cultured enough to know jack crap about wine.  I wasn't about to start drinking it here.  Besides, we were both way underage.  But I suppose that's my problem, and nothing to do with the restaurant. Service was obliging and friendly.  Didn't have any problem with bad service, as other reviewers mentioned. So.. eventually... sometime after appetizers come along... we get our pasta dishes.  Which were mediocre.  That's great right?  A nice-sized portion of pasta that tastes okay. Not when said pasta has a price tag pushing $30.  Not when the tab comes to over $80.  I'd be happy to pay $30 for pasta that was very good.  Mediocre just doesn't cut it. What did we order?  Let's see... this wasn't too long ago, but the dishes were so unremarkable that I barely have any recollection.  One of them was the "Ossobucco" pasta dish (veal)... the other had salmon. This place isn't worth going to, period.  Unless you're into the "atmosphere" much more than the food, and have conveniently lost all your taste buds so it doesn't really matter what you're eating anyway.
We had no idea there were restaurants a couple blocks off of Cal Ave.  Going with the rule that if it's a bit out of the way, it must be good to stay in business, we gave the place a try.  Quite good. Chicken parm was good, with good marinara sauce.  I did have to ask for grated parmesan, but the waiter promptly brought it.  Wife's gnochi was good.  My favorite was the polenta appetizer and the couple pieces that came with my entree.  Very good.  We ordered one glass of wine to share, and the waiter graciously gave us another one on the house. Friendly place, good food.
The decor of this place is very inviting. It's a great relaxing spot in Palo Alto. I purchased a coupon off of Groupon. For those of you who don't know, Groupon gives you great coupons for restaurants around the bay area. I paid $10 for a $20 coupon. It's a great way to save a little bit when I go out. Yelping can be costly! You just have to make sure to tip off of the pre-discounted amount. We had Julio as our waiter. He seated us right away when he saw us, and was really friendly. I think he didn't understand what I was asking him a lot of the time though haha. I wanted a glass of wine, and he gave me this huge list. The list had prices by the bottle, and I only wanted a glass. So I turned to the back of the book and it was a list by the glass. I noticed there wasn't sauvignon blanc on there, just chardonnay. So I asked Julio and he said "so you don't want it?" I was so confused I just said nevermind, We had the bruschetta for appetizers which was great. You can really taste the freshness of the food here. Everything tasted fresh here, and I really appreciate that. As for entree, he had a simple pasta in a red meat sauce. He absolutely loved it. I was trying to decide between the linguine vongole and the rainbow pasta that was the special of the day. Alright, so I don't know the Italian lingo at all, so I asked Julio what the rainbow pasta was. he said it was a ragu. And I asked if it was a meat sauce or just had meat in it? He said there was meat and pasta basically. Little did I know, ragu is like stew. And I don't like stew at all! Haha, but it was my fault, I should have asked more specific questions or looked up what lamb ragu was on google, instead of assuming it was a meat sauce. When it came out, there was cheese all up in it when I asked for no cheese. I never send food back but I really can't eat cheese. He was really nice about it and I got a new one within 10 minutes. Anyway, naturally, I didn't enjoy it, but it was my own fault, not Julio's. I still ate it and it was very fresh, cooked well. I wish the pasta was just a little more well done, but it was still very good. Although, I also wish I went with one of the pastas I am familiar with, I would have loved it I'm sure. Overall my experience was great and I would come back. The one thing I did not appreciate was when I presented my coupon and given my discount, I was asked "you know the rules of Groupon right?" OF COURSE I DO! I know I'm young, but I'm a great tipper. I would never give a coupon and only tip off of my new total. That's so rude! I work in a restaurant too, so even if I really don't like the service, I tip 15%, which has only happened once or twice. When the service is satisfactory it's 20% automatic tip at least. It's not easy working at a restaurant, and so I love to tip generously when I get great service. I guess Julio was worried we were shady kids, but I hope now he has more faith in young adults! Besides, it clearly states on http://Groupon.com that when you use those coupons, you need to tip accordingly. So, everyone who uses them should be aware. Those who don't are just mean mean people!
I know that the proprietors tout themselves as authentic Italian, but I wasn't super impressed. I came here for lunch so my party and I were able to avail ourselves of the outdoor seating. The tables and chairs are roomy and spaced well apart from the other parties. The umbrellas provide nice shade. However, I had a really difficult time understanding the wait staff's accents. I don't think they were Italian accents either. Also, The waiter seemed to have a very difficult time remembering that I wanted flat water as opposed to Pellegrino. And when I ran out, no refill was ever offered. That annoyed me. I don't like salty fizzy water, even if it is expensive and high class! As for the food, I prefer my pasta to be much more al dente. My penne was definitely pretty limp. The homemade sausage was quite yummy, but all in all, the dish was rather lackluster and unmemorable. The one thing I did appreciate was that the sauce was not overly salty. Then again, the lack of seasoning was not a plus either. I kept contemplating asking for the salt and pepper but it was too far away on the other side of the table. At the prices they charge, I'm not sure I'll be back. On the other hand, one of the other lunch attendees ordered a grilled salmon that came with rapini and what looked like fried mashed potato balls (reminiscent of Gregoire's in Berkeley...mmmmm so good). I would definitely be willing to try those!
yet, on of the best culinary experiences i had in the bay area. The food is amazing and unique the wine list is very impressive, the atmosphere too. I turly recommend it as an Italian dinner place.
Every time I eat here, I feel like I am rich and am living the good life.  This is authentic Italy in all aspects.  The wait staff is impeccably dressed, the bruschetta is delicious, and the wine list is fabulous. Parking is a bit challenging, but if you are okay with walking a block or two - and, let's be honest, we could all do with more walking - it's worth it.
A recent trip to Half Moon Bay California came with a handful of dining recommendations.  Caffe Riace was the only one which was recommended not by one person, but by two! From the Appetizers to the Entree my experience was top notch.  I enjoyed both the Cannelloni della Mamma and the Salsiccia alla Siciliana (Sicilian Sausage). And let's not talk about the wine list!  The waiter recommended a Brunello which proved to be the perfect accompaniment to our meal. I have spent the last several months trying to figure out an excuse to go back to Palo Alto.  I'm sure that one day soon I'll be back, dining al fresco in their outdoor dining area and enjoying another 5-star meal. If you are in the area you just can't go wrong.
A great find in the California Ave. business district. We (me, husband and 2 year old) went for dinner with another couple and I was a little nervous when I first arrived that it was going to be a stuffy place and not kid-friendly, but it turned out to be fine. Sure, they have glass tables (not really kid-friendly) and when I asked for milk for my toddler, they brought it out in the same glass that we were using for water, filled to the rim (and no straw)...fast-forward to potential spillage and glass breakage, but that's all ok because the food was really good! I got the linguine vongole, which I always get if it's on the menu and it was very tasty. Real clams, not the canned ones and spicy. Husband and other friend got the osso bucco, which hands down was the best entree at the table. Ah.Maze.Ing. Get it. You won't be disappointed. The standout appetizers were the risotto balls and the kobe beef carpaccio which wasn't on the menu but the waiter got it for us anyhow. We will definitely go back when the weather is nicer to sit in the large outdoor patio area. Definitely more kid-friendly out there.
Nice quaint restaurant. I really liked the outdoor seating option with the statues, fountain and a lot of shade. Inside seating area is small but very nice as well. The food was slighty above average. I had the bruschetta, gnocchi (my next quest is to find the best gnocchi in the bay area) and the tiramisu. Our waiter was fantastic. Great big smile and very attentive. The only thing that was negative about this place was the maitre d'. What's up with this dude?? Looked more like a bouncer with his shades and attitude, not very welcoming. He hardly acknowledged my party when we came in.  Looked he was going to seat us but didn't and one of the waiters ended up seating us. Did not acknowledge us on the way out either. It was funny to watch him fawn over the next person who came in who happened to be a younger female. Get a new maitre d' before he weirds more people out!!
Outdoor patio is pretty nice, indoor tables not so great. I give this place 2 stars because our waiter Julio was really friendly and enthusiastic. We ordered: - Butternut squash soup: so-so it had a strange vinegar taste and I don't think it was the "soup of the day" pretty sure it was microwaved. - Daily salad with pears & figs: I ALWAYS finish my salad, I couldn't eat this one bc there was OVERDOSE of vinaigrette, I was hoping for fresh figs & crostini was cold. So this salad is a failure. - Handmade shrimp ravioli: tasted like chinese shrimp dumpling "har kow". Enough said. - Spicy linguini bolognaise: I was just happy the linguini was aldente. Overall, don't think I would go back.
To be fair, the staff seemed slammed when we got there. But come on, it was a Saturday night, we had reservations and yet we had to wait at the host stand for a good 20 minutes. After finally getting sat and waiting another 10 minutes to order, we got our stale salads, but no utensils and no drinks! The staff was friendly and one of the guys had just started a few days ago, but how can you be so ill prepared on a Saturday night? The ambiance inside is comparable to a Dennys and the food was ok at best. Not sure if it was a really off night, but for being off the main drag in PA, you would think they would do and offer more.
We went as a party of four on a January Saturday evening for my wife's birthday with our dear friends.  We had an open table reservation for 7:30.  We arrived at 7:30 at the outside maitre d stand.  They told us that our table was not ready yet, that they were running a few minutes behind and that once they sat another party, we could sit at a table outside while we wait for our table.  Yes, there was a heat lamp.  After five more minutes, we sat at this outside table. We waited at the outside table while my wife got colder and they came over and told us that we would have to wait five more minutes, do we want a drink.  They brought over menus and we waited and waited.  No one ever came over to get a drink order.  OK, this would not be terrible if we had a drink and I think for sitting and waiting well past our reservation time outside, they should have bought us a drink.  That did not happen.  At 8 PM, we were still waiting there.  I went to find the maitre d/manager and I bumped into him, he said, oh, your table is ready right this way.  They sat us at 8:02. Now OK, we were still enjoying one another's company.  Still can work out.  We are given menus by our waitress.  She leaves.  Comes back a few minutes later and as we are about to order drinks, not gives us the specials.  We order drinks.  She comes back a few minutes later and takes our order without writing anything down.  She comes back a short time later with three salads (mine is the one missing) and without the dressing on the side for our friends.  Five minutes later she comes back with my salad and our friend's dressing. Main course arrives in fair amount of time later with two of our main courses brought out.  The other two were brought out a good 3-5 minutes later and one of our friend's cioppino order is brought back prepared one of the ways she discussed, but CLEARLY did not order.  Fortunately, it turned out OK since she liked it this way.  My eggplant pasta had a tiny amount of eggplant and was not very tasty. Since it was my wife's Bday, our friends told them this and our waitress brought a piece of Tiramisu before asking for other's desserts/coffee order.  By the way, my wife does NOT like tiramisu, We inquire about the different desserts and 5-10 minutes later the coffees come out with one of the desserts we inquired about but CLEARLY did not order.  She took that dessert back and brought back the other one.  No federal offense here, but he service was VERY poor and most of the food was not very good.  Perhaps the worst part is they did not do anything about it to make us feel better about it.  Now we vote with a bad yelp and Open Table review.  Not going here any time soon.
Delicious food at a reasonable price. I had a table outside next to the fountain. It's a perfect place for a date. I definitely plan on coming back
What a delightful hidden gem in the somewhat industrial part of Palo Alto!  Caffe Riace is located on the bottom floor of an condominum complex, and it almost feels somewhat out of place, until you close your eyes while siting under the stars on the patio and sipping your vino.  I'm pretty sure this is what dining it Italy would feel like. I had a lovely father daughter dinner there a few nights ago, and really was shocked there were not more people there.  The food was just great, the service was extemely attentive, and the bill, was not really that bad for what we ordered. First, you definitely need to order some appetizers ... the salmon carpaccio was outstanding, and the arracini was great too.  I had the linguni vongole for my dinner, which was a bit garlicy even for me. I'm always on the hunt for an Italian restaurant that can top my dad's cooking, and this just might be the place.
From reading other reviews here it looks like your experience  might be night and day depending on when you go. Luckily it seems like I went on a good day today. I'd been recommended this restaurant by a dozen people over the last 5 years and I'm surprised I'd never tried it. I think I've tried just about every Italian joint in Menlo Park/PA. While working with a client,  we decided to try something neither of us had gone to before, to take a break from the meetings we were in.  Even though he'd worked in the area for 6 years he didn't know about this place either. So we figured we'd explore the unknown. It's a pretty nice day today (70 degrees partly cloudy) so the fact  that the dining was almost entirely outside was great. We were immediately served an assortment of bread and your standard olive oil/vinegar/garlic sauce. The next thing I noticed is we were automatically brought ice tea. Not sure if this is standard practice but  since that was what I was going to get anyways, it worked out. Good ice tea too. I'm not sure how most people who don't want it would react. Kinda of peculiar. Since I hadn't had pesto in a long time (it's just a lot of effort to make sometimes) I decided on the Tortellini Pesto while my client got the Sicilian Style Grilled Sausage. We did the family style split and found the food delicious with everything being freshly made. The drawbacks we did see: 1. Prices are a bit high for lunch. If the taste and freshness level remain high then that's not a problem unless you decide to eat here often. 2. The ambiance is definitely PA. Lots of biz lunches (hell I was one of them), lawyers types, and a few odd college students and I think people from the courthouse. 3. The pace is definitely leaisurely so if it were crowded I can see lunch taking a long time. It seems however that's what most people were there for. A long lunch. This environment maybe more suitable for dinner but I guess on a nice sunny day it 's worth giving a try. I'm happy to say I've finally tried it and am also glad I didn't hit it on an "off" day.
I love this place!  Definitely a beautiful place to bring a date, hold a business lunch or just want to eat outdoors cause of the awesome weather! The waiters are awesome and are really helpful pairing wine with entree.  I've ate here several times and always left completely happy and stuffed! You have to order the Osso Bucco and Risotto balls!  The Risotto balls are addictive!  Osso Bucco slides right off the bone!  Trust me...it's worth every penny:)
I don't care if a single person who works there isn't italian, this place is awesome!! + Stunning place to eat, mostly outdoor seating, with some cool fountains and sculptures + Wine list is great, and some great help in making your choice + Food - AMAZING!  Appetizers, dishes, desserts, all good.  see below for more details + Good service, lots of fun.  Cory helped us pick wines and gave us some samples + Right in Palo, was a little hard to find, according to my nav, but we got there Dishes: The antipasti appetizer was very good.  Caprese salad, eggplant, and more.. - The gnocchi was very good - The shells in pesto was great - I didn't have it, but our friend raved about the lamb ravioli Desserts: Bread pudding/creme brule - wow! Orange gelato was sooo good! And some real good coffee, as well. I can't wait to go back...
Went here recently for my mom's birthday. The outdoor seating is nice, with ample heat lamps, but the decor was a little weird. Large murals of smiling lions and monkeys with human faces? Really? The over-sized roman warrior statues were more in keeping with the general motif but, as comfortable as I am with my sexuality, I really don't want to be looking at giant metal uncircumcised penises while I'm eating thanks. But hey, if that's your thing this might be your place... The appetizers were all winners. Excellent caesar and caprese salads. Unfortunately my entree, a pasta carretierra special with wild mushrooms, was not very good. It could have been nice, but it was absolutely DROWNING in oil. To the point of near-inedibility. Which was a shame because the mushrooms were beautiful. Others in my party seemed more satisfied with their entrees, but mine was a big letdown. The service was also pretty bad. It took us over a half an hour before we got water, longer for wine. Also, none of the wait-staff seemed to be at all familiar with the wine list. We ordered a chianti and a chardonnay, and ten minutes later the waiter returned to tell us they didn't actually have either of the wines we had ordered. He summoned somebody else to advise us on the wine, but when prompted to recommend a dry chardonnay the second guy merely referred us to the notes on the wine list. We had to go through several more options before we found wines that they actually had available. Maybe we just caught them on a bad day or something but the whole wine ordeal had me rolling my eyes big time. Not a word or gesture of apology either. All in all we had a nice dinner marred by poor service and a few culinary misfires. The house-made gelato was nice for dessert, but not nice enough to make up for Caffe Riace's weaknesses.
I must admit, I was a little hesitant when I went to the bathroom and happened to see what looked like a microwave in the kitchen.  However, I needn't have worried.  The service was extremely attentive, though they did take their time to serve food, and the food was tasty.  We got the bruschetta (good and salty), the carpaccio (delicious, but could have used some arugula), the caesar salad (solid, but underdressed), and the buccotini and gnocci, which were both very fresh and tasty.  They give pretty large potions, so though it's a bit on the pricey side, it's still worth it.  The pasta I had was perfectly al dente, and even my toddler was happy the whole time we were there. Outdoor seating is cute, and there's plenty to look at.  The place is kid friendly, too.  This restaurant is definitely a hidden gem, and as good as (and classier) than Osteria, my other go-to Palo Alto Italian place.
Cafe Riace is all right. The landscaping and decor was pretty nice. But not enough to compensate for the mediocre food. Not much of a vegetarian selection either. The one item that was vegetarian, they were not serving that day. The tiramisu was too rich. Had better elsewhere. I also had a taste of my friend's gelato and it wasn't anything special. The service was okay. Our waitress said everything on the menu was absolutely delicious which was not the case for all four of us. But then again, it's her job to tell customers that everything on the menu taste great, so I wont ding her for that. Everyone ordered something different and not one seem to stand out. Overall, a great restaurant to hang out on the courtyard on a summer evening while sipping wine with friends. Not the place to go when you're hungry for delicious food.
I was reluctant to give Caffe Riace five stars on principle, but it really was as good as it gets.  We went with our preteen son for my wife's birthday.  While the food was excellent, it was really the service throughout the entire evening which really impressed me.  The hostess was very warm and welcoming.  Our server was professional and friendly.  Even the young man busing the table was polite and helpful.  At one point, my wife started to get chilly (We had wanted to sit outdoors.), and the server even got her and my son blankets(!), while Alfonso (who was busing the table) started the heat lamps. Anyway, the food was great.  My wife had the lamb shank which was the absolute star of the evening, while I had a fusilli pasta dish with ground sausage which was better than anything like it that I'd ever had before. All three of us had starter salads, entrees, we shared an appetizer, and we ordered two desserts.  All for under $130. We definitely recommend this restaurant, and will be going again ourselves.
Hidden gem. Al Fresco dining amidst artistic fountains in a quiet residential neighborhood (between California Avenue and Palo Alto Square).  No better ambiance in the area to enjoy lunch or dinner with an authentic Italian experience. Fresh, homemade pastas, sauces and gelato, and extensive wine list with many unique Italian wines.  Highly recommend the anti-pasta platter, Momma's Cannelloni, and the Salsiccia Alla Siciliana. Warm, friendly service. Bravo Giuseppe Carrubba (owner)!
Loved the outdoor dining area, especially on a Sunday night.  It's in a random business area, not where you'd expect to find a restaurant, but parking is pretty easy on weekends and at night. It was a busy Sunday night, and food quality and service were both lacking.  Things came out really slowly, and the servers that night seemed really inexperienced and a bit overwhelmed. Appetizers like the polenta, bruschetta, and eggplant were all pretty standard.  The best part was the dipping sauce for the bread as we waited for our dishes.  Pasta dishes were mostly just pasta, without much else.  For the portion and quality of the mains, the prices aren't justified, even in Palo Alto. Admittedly, the patio seating area is gorgeous on a warm night, but the food and service kind of ruined the experience.
I often have work lunches at Riace, and while the food is pretty standard -- antipasti, basic pasta dishes (but unfortunately, no secondi) -- I always look forward to eating there.  Why?  Well, virtually all of its tables are on a sunny outdoor patio, and its waitstaff can be quite charming. Right... mainly, I look forward to lunch on the company dime.  I'll find a way to enjoy just about anything when it's free.  Not that there's anything wrong with the food -- it's fine -- but it tastes alot better when I know I'm not picking up the tab.
Hosted a client dinner here with my execs and as usual Riace was perfecto.  Dunno about the Osso buco- as it was crappo.  The pasta and sauce around the meat was great- but I got a fatty piece of meat....aghhh Everyone else loved the pasta and 2 people loved the Tonno (Tuna). Julio the server was EXCELLENT.  I was concerned after reading the reviews since I had not been to Riace in years.   I had a "talk" with Julio prior to dinner and made sure that he was going to be peppy with the service.  And he was. He has excellent recommendations for wine and made sure we were warm enough by flanking us with gas lamps.
Dear Caffe Riace, Well aren't you the cutest little thing ever! Do you remember me? I've been here a few times for lunch. Your outdoor dining is soooo adorable! The ambiance with the fountain and rustic surrounding architecture gives me flashbacks of my trip to Italy years ago. The indoor dining really can't compare, which must be why there are only a few tables inside (around 5 of them). After a 2 week no-carb diet, your place is the first I dreamed of when I returned to work. I love that everything is made fresh daily - it really makes a difference. I was surprised to find that your olive oil dip for the standard bread that all Italian restaurants give contains actual black olives. I'm not really an olive fan, but I could barely even tell that they were olives. So far, my coworker, Nicole P., and I have tried: Spaghetti Carrettierra - So light and perfect for lunch! Nicole usually gets this. The portions are generous so there is usually some to take home for dinner. Fusilli alla Siciliana - Delicious! The pasta is amazing and you can really tell that it is made fresh. Just the right amount of sauce and flavor, too. Linguini Tutto Mare - I tried this the last time I was here. It was good, but I feel like it was just like any other Frutti di Mare I've had in the past. I'll probably opt for something new on the menu for next time. Ravioli Special of the Day - I forgot what it was called because it wasn't on the menu, but it has ravioli stuffed with mascarpone, some type of mushroom, I think, and of course...cheese. Nicole ordered this and loved it as well. It's funny because she said she never likes getting the special of the day but was sold on the dish when she heard mascarpone. Anyway, thanks for accepting the Passport card as well! Nicole and I can usually get lunch here for under $20. Although, even without it, I would still come here. See you soon, Caffe Riace! xoxo, Mehgan
Great date spot. The outdoor seating is beautiful (beware of naked statues everywhere) - we had a table right next to the fountain... that alone caused me to fall in love with this place... the sound of the fountain was so relaxing, and the statue had a washing machine on her head - crazy! Had the Insalata di cipolle e pomodoro - was yummy, but the crushed red peppers on the top really threw me (not a fan of spicy) - next time I'll leave those off. Service was a bit slow so that's the reason for -1 star, but I'd go back. It's just too fun not to.
When I looked at how nice the restaurant was, I thought that the food would be in small portions, and pretty expensive. To my surprise the quantity that you get, was quiet large. But personally, I didn't think that the food was all that amazing, it didn't have a "stand out" factor. Just nothing special. Although, my friend did get a leg of lamb, and instead of the small slices you see at other restaurants, it was literally the leg of a lamb. The bone of the leg, with all the meat attached.
My favorite part of Caffe Riace is  the ambiance. The place filled with Statues of Naked Greek Models (mostly men) with their Junk out. The management has been able to create an atmosphere that reminds me of Italy, even though I've never visited there (as of Feb. 2008). There is water flowing, authentic Italian Waiters with Italian accents, and just an overall feel that you're dining at an Italian restaurant just outside of Rome. But if you look around or happen to go to Parking lot, you'll notice the office buildings and the expressway, which results in the whole fantasy of being in Italy quickly dissipating. The food, which I care most about is good, not great. The pricing is average, not too much. I must add that, on a hot summer night, Caffe Riace would be a great place for a dinner date. I wish I could give this place 3.5 stars. It gets most of it's points for the romantic ambiance. But the food is just good, not fantastic and the pricing is just average for the quality you get.
This place is a little hard to find, which adds to its charm. It's located in between two buildings and it's all patio. In the middle is a strange fountain of a woman carrying a washer machine. No joke. You have to see it. I came here for an office birthday lunch. We had reservations so we didn't have to wait. They have huge umbrellas everywhere so you are always in the shade, which is nice. I wish we got a little more sun. There was 9 of us and we all got our orders in almost as soon as we sat down. I shared the Spinach Salad with mushrooms, anisette, pancetta, and ricotta and the Rope Pasta with mushrooms, peas, and sausage. Both were delicious. The salad was exceptional really. The pancetta was warm so it cooked the spinach down but it wasn't soggy or wet. Just right. The pasta sauce was really nice. It tasted fresh and the pasta was cooked al dente. We also shared the bruschetta which was really flavorful. The reason why I took a star away was because the waiter was too campy for my taste. I get it when it's a table of 9 women you wanna be all cute. But he kept calling us "Bella" and using Italian words to charm us, when his name was Julio. And he brought out two dishes like 20 minutes after we all started eating saying that he had to because of "blah blah blah". Seriously, just bring it out. And don't wait 5 minutes to bring out 2 extra plates when our food is waiting to be eaten. But all in all a great place. I would love to come here for dinner one time.
Loved the outdoor only dining setting.  A great place for nice warm nights, though they do have those propane heaters for chillier days.  I love the fountain in the middle.  My seafood pasta dish was tasty and of a sizeable portion - though nothing that stands out.  The servers are also very friendly.  But I do like this place more for the ambiance than the food. 4 stars. --------------------- Update - 7/13/2007,  2 stars Demoted to 3 stars.  Shared the antipasti for 1person, the calamari pasta, and a bottle of chardonay.  I've been here before and already knew the portions were pretty large, so sharing an appetizer and entree btw 2 ppl was the way to go.  Plus I had set my mind already to check out the new Palo Alto hot spot Fraiche for some after dinner yogurt, so I didn't want to be too full. The chard was a bad recommendation by the waiter, the antipasta was below average, and the calamari pasta was so salty it wasn't even finished.  Like someone else said, the dish was overly sauced and barely had any pasta in it.  It was very heavy also.  Pasta Pomodoro made a better pasta - at half the price too. This time around, the service went downhill also.  We felt rushed by our server.  There was no Italian charm... all the Italian waiters from last time were not there this time around.  Too bad... they used to have decent food, good service, and a great atmosphere - its only saving grace now. I won't be recommending this place anymore.
I liked the intimate, small room with few tables, but my dinner mates did not. The foods was just okay -- I had the chicken parmesan.  But definitely not good value for what it was. For a place with very few tables, service was extremely slow  Over 30 minutes from order to delivery.  Ridiculous. Won't be returning.
No need to write a long review which few people ever take the time to read. Eating wonderful Italian cuisine under the stars surrounding by artistic fountains in an atmosphere that equals dining between buildings in the heart of Italian cities such as Florenze, Genoa or Rome  is what best describes this neighborhood gem. The service is outstanding,  the owner and his brother very engaging  .....  you want to impress your date,  or meet up with friends,  this is the place to go on the lower peninsula. (and easy to get to by car   ... parking a breeze)
My friend Kelly, just took me here for my birthday lunch. It is soooo European feeling here, 2 giant statues of naked people, one of them a woman is pouring water into a big fountain. Our table was right next to it and it was very loud. There was also Italian music blaring in my other ear, but I just had a glass of wine to get over it! I ordered the gnocchi and my frien dthe spinach and ricotta filled cannelloni(sp?). Both were good, not mind blowing but ok. It was expensive for a lunch though. I liked it, I would like to go back for dinner though, sitting on the patio on a nice summer night is propably muy muy romantico!
Rainy and cold unfortunately.  But we were seated in a cozy room and enjoyed the meal.  The gorgonzola polenta was a standout as was the kobe brasaola with the burrata.  Special of the day was a sole which was also excellent.  The pasta dish and chicken dish were just OK.  Our waitress lacked a little finesse but tried her best.
Southern Italian/Sicilian Beautiful, outside eating tiled courtyard with striking Greco-Italo warrior statues The perfect site for al fresco dining Super friendly service, especially by Alessandro Nice U.S. and Italian wines Large, tasty salads Biscotti type house bread with delicious olive tapenade Delicious pastas and salmon entree; vegetables cooked perfectly al dente Fab almond creamy dessert Put on your bucket list
Good outdoor restaurant on a warm evening.  Enjoyed the wine and  pasta dishes w.  The good wines by the glass were on the expensive side.
Very nice place. Both seafood pastas were delicious :-)
Even though it's a bit overpriced, I like Riacce. It feels good to eat here. A fountain of a nude laundress presides over the courtyard restaurant. Larger-than-life male nudes complete the surrounding scene. Despite the evident anatomy lesson, I've had no qualms bringing my young kids here. In fact, they have a wonderful time wandering around the fountain both before and after their meals (usually a shared pasta dish). With a group, the family-style appetizer plate is full of fresh tastes and consistently gets the meal off to a great start. For dinner, I typically order the cannelloni. The waiters seem to have a good time, and their warm, upbeat vibe lends an authentic Italian family flair to the dining experience. You can imagine Mamma in the back running the kitchen... The service pace is relaxed, meaning that Riacce is a good place for a celebration - and not such a good place if you're an uptight speed-eater or if you need to get to a meeting right after lunch.
That was a VERY BAD experience! Our server was terrible  - we ended up with a huge bill for nothing. Our table was so noise because of the fountain running. The server had selected Sanpelegrino for us without even asking and changed us around $60 for the antipasti. The two wines on the wine list that we chose were not available, so they served us what they wanted.  Then they would not accept the 3 credit cards saying the they can take only two and would refuse to split the check. We didn't have so much cash to pay the bill...The food was nothing special..
Super cute, hidden gem! My brother bought the groupon and we decided to check it out on this rainy day. Too bad the weather wasn't more permitting because their outdoor area is beautiful!! Their outdoor seating involves a fountain, a mini(yes, the car), a vespa, and several outdoor patio seating arrangements. It had a very Italian feel and the ambiance was definitely up to par. 2 thumbs up for a great atmosphere to pair with great food. I yelped them before I ordered and found the risotto balls to be a hit. THEY DEFINITELY WERE! I had the penne norma which was definitely a tasty delite. I would definitely go back on a weather permitting day to do an outside seating. Only downfall is the small interior. There are very few table inside but I think their main focus is their patio seating. Definitely a place to check out away from downtown Palo Alto.
I wish I could give it 2.5 stars, but I'm going to err on the side of caution.  The wait for a table was fine...only a few minutes.  Strange, though, considering there were plenty of open tables - they just weren't set up yet.  We were seated, and I already loved the atmosphere....outdoor cafe, lovely statues...I was super excited for a fabulous meal.  What we got?  Not so fabulous. A waiter came by and got our order for the smoked salmon carpaccio...which was fantastic, admittedly.  Then an entirely different waiter came by to get our meal order, which was sort of strange, but we rolled with it.  Then comes over the first waiter, and apparently there was a misunderstanding as to who was supposed to serve us.  They got it figured out eventually, but the service was curt at best. They were out of the ossobusco and the lamb shank, so I ordered the steak, medium rare, which came out more like medium well.  BLECH.  It was tolerably moist, because it was covered in a ton of tomatoes, mushrooms, and all sorts of other stuff that kept it moist.  I scraped all the other stuff off, and ate just the steak.  The veggies were okay, but what kind of restaurant only has mixed veggies?  I just wanted some broccoli, and it was no where to be found. We had to beg for water, which is ridiculous at the price we were paying for the meal.  We had to beg for the check at the end, and the waiter ended up getting someone else to bring it to us while he sat down to eat. Over all?  It sucked.  The atmosphere was nice, until you had to deal with anyone or eat the food.
FOUR STARS FOR THE AMBIANCE ONLY.... Honestly, this place is only good for the ambiance. When I went, it was 103 degrees during the day and by night time it was round 80 degrees. It was such a nice night to eat outside and that's what we exactly did. It took about 20 mins to get us seated after our reservation time. They ran out of a lot of thing on the menu and then didn't tell us. We ordered the Antipasto Riace and they ran out of Melenzane. Instead of telling us that, they just decided to put more bruschetta and roasted peppers, thinking we won't notice... but we did.... Other than that, the food is just alright. Dude.... side note, I sat down and the freaking toilet seat was broken and I almost fell in the friggin toilet! Also, our server spilled a pitcher of ice all over our table. This place... !! o__O.... woosa...woosa...
Amazing outdoor ambiance with beautiful decor and a very peaceful setting. Service was excellent - we had a very courteous, professional, and helpful server. Sad that people like him are harder to find these days =/ what's happening to customer service these days everywhere else? Ok back on topic... Their wine list is huge... like a giant book of wines. I'll have to come back here to try some. Their olive oil for their bread and little tiny chunks of olives in it... so yummy! I had their gnocchi in pesto sauce and it was very tasty. It came in a generous portion as well so we got to take home leftovers. The place may be hard to find if you're not familiar with the area - even the entrance to this place is outdoors, and it's only marked with a sign as small as a sandwich board. This restaurant is pretty much entirely outdoors, with the exception of about 2-3 tables inside their tiny indoor area where the kitchen and restrooms are.
We loved everything about this place from service and food to our indoor seating (though next time we want to try outside)...go, enjoy.
What a hidden Gem! I found it by accident through some internet ad. Can't beat the home made and fresh ingredients Cafe Riace provides and the charming outdoor patio with fascinating Roman Sculptures and a huge water fountain. We had the Risotto Rice Balls which were good but nothing as special as the Parmesan Chicken and Pasta Penne Norma with NY style Ricotta cheese, holy holiness. Never thought I was a Ricotta fan until now. It was a very creamy texture like water Mozarella. Waiter Guiseppe was friendly and definitely added to the whole feel of  a mini vacation. We drank Pino Gricio and of course Cappucino and Teramisu for dessert. Fantastic experience. I hope their biz will increase, as we were told last Sunday (oct 3rd 2010) was their last weekend lunch, now it'll only be open Mon-Fri....): A must have and must try for all food lovers!!!
Not worth it in the winter, because pretty much all the seating is outdoor, but absolutely perfect on a summer evening.  Wonderful, hidden cafe area with all outdoor seating, some fun fountains, and good hearty Italian food with a nice thorough wine list.  Very secluded, and very romantic. See a full review here: http://sibilous.blogspot...
I had a business lunch there and boy was I glad the other person was paying! We both ordered the "Insalata  di spinaci e fungi" aka spinach salad with sauteed mushrooms, pancetta and ricotta cheese.  It was tasty, but the chunks of pancetta were large and few.  I'd rather have smaller pieces to infuse the salad the delicious taste. For my entree, I ordered "Penne Siciliana" aka penne with spinach, fresh tomatoes, and homemade sausage.  The sauce was light, very tasty with flecks of red pepper to give it some heat. Service was attentive and prompt.   The garden atmosphere is nice, but you're sandwiched between an office building and apartments.   The statuary is OK.  There are also some unusual, odd even, murals of people's faces with animal bodies.  I'm not sure how that art is supposed to work into the garden atmosphere. As I said, I was glad I wasn't paying.  My host picked up the tab and I discreetly glanced at it.  Almost $60 for lunch and two people!   I'd been embarrassed if I had to turn that receipt into my office, or perhaps I'm just being cheap.   The food is good, but way overpriced.  I'd look for other Italian restaurants that are more reasonably priced for what you're getting.
The free focaccia was yummy especially when I soaked it in balsamic vinegar :)  A little denser than I prefer, and not as soft and fluffy as I think it should be, but still good. Bruschetta was on a thin crunchy crostini and was yummy in my mouth in two bites.  Probably one for someone with a big mouth. I ordered the Pollo alla Parmigiana AKA Chicken Parmesan and it was quite delicious.  The chicken cutlet was crunchy on the edges and soft and tender inside.  The marinara was perfectly balanced, not too sweet and not too tangy. So, why 3 stars?  My friends' dishes were not so good.  They got the top two pasta entrees on the right-side of the page.  Whatever they were, they sounded good, but they were dry and overly garlicky, and thus not so fabulous. Also, while I appreciate being asked how I enjoy my meal, every 5 minutes is not so enjoyable.  The constant and incessant, "How is everything?"  "How are you doing today?" and so on kept interrupting our dinner conversation and eventually drove me a little nuts.
I have been here twice and had pretty good experiences both times. The tables are outside in a very nice setting with cool statues and a cool fountain on a quiet, suburban Palo Alto street. When the weather is perfect, Caffe Riace is an amazing experience. It is definitely pricey ($15-$25 for each dish), but I feel you are paying for the atmosphere. I have had good service both times, they kept giving us more bread without us asking and the waiter was very friendly. Most people were older, well-dressed, country club type people, but my group of college-aged kids, wearing jeans/shorts plus polos, were not treated differently and didn't stand out too much. I recommend the Fusilli Siciliana. It is one of the cheaper items on the menu ($16.95 i think?) and was really good.
The good:  I was pretty happy with the food!  Would like to try more things here.  It was dark but it looks like an attractive outdoor area. The bad:  Kind of expensive for a grad student's budget (but I wasn't paying)  Also, I think there's minimal indoor seating, so we were outside in a tent full of heat lamps.  I think it'd be better in warm weather. Spend money here, since you'll be subsidizing our grad student pub on campus, which is run by the same people, and which I don't want to see get closed.
Caffe Riace was highly recommended to me by my co-worker who is a foodie.  The ambiance is amazing.  Very cute little fiat and two vespas greet you as you enter and the dining experience is quite romantic and cozy in the patio.  The heat lamps were running well during our dinner and our server offered to bring out blankets if we were still cold!  I saw a note stating that they have indoor seating now available. After placing our order, we received our bread (delicious) with it's unique dipping sauce almost immediately.  But then our entrees arrived and we wondered what had happened to our Caprese con Mozzarella di Bufala???   It never arrived and our server seemed to never even recalled that we had ordered an appetizer! I ordered the Pasta Bolognese which was pretty good and my sister ordered one of the specials of the night...Spaghetti with meatballs.  I think her pasta dish was a little more tasty.  But we noticed something else as we enjoyed our dinner.  The server for our neighboring table read off the specials to his party and we realized that our server had neglected to tell us about two of their specials for the night! We asked for our entrees to be packed up to go and then we didn't see our server again.  Well, at least for 15 minutes.  Luckily, the other servers noticed and called his attention to the fact that we needed assistance. I've read through some of the other yelp reviews and after reading about poor service others experienced, I'm wondering if our server is responsible for those reviews too. Decent food which is a bit overpriced, but if you're aiming for ambiance, this is your place.
Very good food in an outdoor and relatively upscale place, but not fancy. A great place to take your good friend for a date. I love the whole kalamata olives they give you. The food has always been very good.
An oasis in the middle of nowhere. The food here is quite good (try the manicotti and the arancine), but the real draw is the outdoor seating area. Be sure you go when the weather accommodates sitting outside! P.S. - the service is hit or miss, so maybe leave a little extra time for dinner.
One of the greatest things about this place is the private courtyard/statue garden. Perfect for dining on a beautiful Palo Alto day, which we were blessed with for last week's lunch .The clientele here is a bit older, and the service seems to cater more to that crowd. I found our server nice, but his approach to service was kind of stressful for me (kind of pushy, awkward dynamic, etc). We order the Caprese for our appetizer. I believe our server said that he added an extra mozzarella/tomato for us when he put down the plate (3 sets for the 4 of us to share), but if that was the case, then paying $10 for the usual 2 seems kind of overpriced. I ordered the rope pasta with peas, mushrooms, and sausage. Really liked the flavors and found it not too heavy. The servings are what I expected - Large - so I had plenty to take home even after filling my stomach completely. I also tried the Fusilli Siciliani (w/ spinach, sausage, and tomato) and liked that as well. It had a bit more of  "kick" than my dish, which I liked. Despite the sometimes uncomfortable service and the (possibly) overpriced appetizers, I did enjoy the time I had here. The pastas were excellent - and the courtyard would be a cute place for a rehearsal dinner, birthday party, or any sort of social gathering too.
My husband and I have been going to Caffe Riace for years.  It is our "special date" locale because of the great food, ambiance and service.  The wine list is amazing and the food is superb. Given that the whole restaurant is outside, it is a great place for dinner during the summer, late spring and early fall. You will not be disappointed!
Okay seriously, what's going on with this place?! They seem so confused. The ambiance is incredible, I must admit. That was the draw when I had a bon voyage dinner at Cafe Riace. It was just 3 of us ladies at dinner and it took over 3 hours from start to finish. Don't ever come to Cafe Riace if you are in any sort of a hurry. Maybe this is what it's like in Italy...I don't know. Now if the food was incredible I would be more than willing to wait. The food was nothing but typical. The server was incredibly friendly and nice, but in order to get any sort of service we had to ask for everything way ahead of time because it would take 15 minutes before we got anything for which we asked. If I ever go back, which is highly unlikely, I will probably go earlier in the evening so I'm not there past 10pm. We said bon voyage to our friend and I say bon voyage to Cafe Riace.
Lovely outdoor dining. A great place for a business lunch.  Just don't sit too close to the fountain.  We always take our prospective employees there but only during warm weather.  Even though Riace has heating lamps the place is too open for them to be effective.  For large parties or the lucky few they have a tent set up ...destroys the piazza atmosphere but at least your protected from the elements. I have found all their dishes to be excellent.  The pasta is fresh and slightly al dente.  The  sausage and pepper dish is excellent.   I tend to get their fish specials...I have never had a bad one and most they are superb. The greek sculptures are comic which is nice that these people don't take themselves too seriously.  The fountain has the water spewing from a bronzed washing machine. On a warm day it is hard to go back to work.
Place has dropped off  from its peak 5 years ago or so. Its great for nice weather dining. Staff is just OK, not great. Lunch - fine...Dinner, if you need to dine outside. Food is just ok....
This place is the embodiment of overpriced Italian food. Had a 2 person dinner that came out to over $100 with tax/tip, but without drinks. We had 1 appetizer of cold eggplant. A seafood pasta, and a veal pasta. Both were a little above okay-tasting. Unacceptable for such exorbitant prices. The whole dinner took probably 2 hours - very, very slow. I suppose the tortoise-pace is intentional to you allow you to enjoy your company, the atmosphere, and your meal. The decor and ambiance, in contrast with the food, is splendid. Outdoor seating, fountains, candles, lots of foliage, etc - perfect for a summer evening. If only the food matched the look..
I've been meaning to write a review on this place for a little while. I've been to this restaurant once and had a lovely experience. The food was great and tasted like authentic Italian food. It seemed that a great deal of care had gone into its preparation. It's a nice place for a date, as it has a romantic atmosphere. If you get chilly while sitting outside, they'll furnish you with a cozy, warm blanket. I'm giving it 4 stars because the staff can be a bit quirky, for lack of a better phrase, and some people may not appreciate this (i.e., overly chatty, awkwardly friendly). Oh, one more thing, it's tricky to locate, but its tucked-away location adds to its charm.
Been coming here for years - service is slow and delibrate. Can't be in a hurry. But the food is wonderful. Will return, again and again.
This is a great location.  It is tucked away and had a beautiful courtyard with tables and statues.  The waiters were really friendly and attentive.  The pasta was pretty oily but it was delicious nonetheless. It was great during the day for a business lunch (casual and sunny but really quiet so you could talk) but I would also love to go there in the evening for a date because the courtyard, i imagine, would be great under the night sky!
I love Caffe Riace - the ambiance, food and wine selection is excellent.  I took my boyfriend here for dinner last night and we had a lovely, leisurely evening.  Our waiter Edgar was friendly, knowledgable (he recommended the perfect wine) and polite. The reason I am giving 3 stars is there is room for improvement in two key areas.  First, while I understand that the service philosophy is not to rush you, there were several times during the evening that we needed something from our waiter and it took 10-15 minutes for him to come around.  For example, we ordered the Ricotta Balls as an appetizer and they were divine- however, we did not have enough of the tomato sauce and wanted a little extra.  After 15 minutes they were cold anyways so it didn't really matter.  Additionally, they brought a special dessert for Moe's birthday which was a great touch.  But, after putting the dessert down the waiter disappeared - he didn't ask if I wanted anything such as dessert or coffee.  10 minutes later I did order coffee but the dessert was already gone.  A bit disappointing. The other thing that was a bit "off" is their silverware.  Everything at Caffe Riace is large - the huge statues, the portions, the bowls, and the loud (but pleasant) cascading water fountain.  But, the forks and spoons are light as a feather.  It seemed odd eating a very large bowl of Linguine Vongole with such cheap silverware.  I feel they should invest in something a little more substantial and weighty to hold in your hands. Regardless, I will be back to this lovely restaurant because there is nothing that compares to it in the Bay Area if you are looking for a true Italian dining experience.
As everyone mentioned, the courtyard is lovely. Pasta that's served al dente and promptly is such a nice treat. My husband is Italian (from Bologna, Italy) and loved it. The waiter was very prompt and attentive, the food was good, and the wine was good. My husband had a nice chat  (in Italian) with the "wine expert" before picking a nice southern Italian white. All in all, a very nice dinner, reasonably priced, and SO nice to have good pasta that *I didn't cook* especially after the 100degree day.
It's hidden on a side street, but worth the effort to find the place. Look for the sign (hint-it's close to Fry's so go have a great meal and pick up the latest gadget). Beautiful patio, which was warm enough even on a night that wasn't! The night, the wine, the italian food! Excellent. P.S. Prices in the same ballpark as other italian food, from what I could see.
Decent Italian food, really nice outdoor atmosphere and friendly service - what more could you ask for! We ate here on a recent Tuesday evening, enjoyed the spaghetti and meatball special, gnocchi and swordfish.  Nothing spectacular about any of the food, but everything was good.  We weren't really impressed with the wine, but for $48 it was a good deal.  I'd definitely go back as it's such a charming atmosphere.  I like how they've remodeled the interior as well.
This place evokes fond memories of meals with friends in the summertime and a few notable dates, but after the heat lamps go out, it loses some lustre. I have enjoyed the ambience immensely. Much of the food is wonderful (I recall a rack of lamb with carrots that truly melted in my mouth) although I won't pay $15+ for any dish featuring mostly starches. I will probably bring my own wines from now on. Since it's outdoors and you're often cold, it's harder to excuse slow service if/when it happens. I enjoy Cafe Riace as a fun experience on a warm summer night. The authentic members of their staff bring a touch of class but half the time I go there, the place doesn't seem 'on.' I'll keep hunting for a truly wonderful Italian restaurant in the South Bay.
This place is **Romantic** - I love it.  You eat outside in a little courtyard and they have heaters for the winter.  It is very cozy.  They give you tapenade and bread while you wait.  The food is great for the price and I like going later when things slow a bit and you can hang out and relax. If you live nearby you need to try this place.
Great Italian Food. A little pricey but a great place to go for a special occasion and outdoor eating spots when weather isgood. Food is good. The pasta's are best  and they have some healthy pasta too. Vegetables are cooked perfectly, maintain their color and are crisp. We eat here often and find that service is little slow. they have big list of wines, goes perfectly with this type of food.
The service is 5 star. But the waiting time for the entrees are so long, since it's Italian time. The environment is 4 star. The food is 3 star.
This restaurant happens to be located at the place that is a little hard to find, but it still draws many fans to eat at this place. The outdoor dining area is beautiful and charming at the same time. I love the fountain where Venus was holding a washing machine. The food is very special and delicious. Ask the waiter for their special for the real taste of traditional Italian food. 87/100
Went there for lunch late on Sunday. We were pleasantly surprised that they were still serving lunch just before 2PM. The service was great and attentive. We were three people and all of us enjoyed our food. The sauce on the steak was particularly good. The vegetarian among us enjoyed the cannelloni. Gelatto was good, particularly the cherry flavored. One of us did not like the chocolate flavor, finding it similar to the flavor of regular hot chocolate drinks. Found the prices reasonable.
Caffe Riace exceeded my expectations. Pros: Portions are generous, staff is friendly, pleasant atmosphere, reservations can be made online or by phone. Yelp has a $10 discount when you spend $20 or more. Cons: Be sure to make sure the restaurant is within your price range as it is a little pricey. My experience: On the warm evening of Friday, February 24, 2012, our party of ten went to Caffe Riace to celebrate my 24th birthday. Upon our arrival the manager personally introduced himself, shook my hand, and showed us to our table. We were seated outside around a large round table and watched the setting sun. Our waiter and server, Julio, appeared and was friendly, knowledgeable of the menu items and even spoke some Italian with my parents who are learning the language. As an appetizer we ordered Bruschetta for the whole table, which was delicious. I was delighted when I saw the Penne Norma, one of the few vegetarian Pasta items on the menu. When I bit into the fried eggplant I knew I had made the right choice. After the main course, many people from our party ordered dessert. I, however, was so full from the dinner and appetizer that I could not take another bite of anything, but judging by the looks on people's faces I am certain that each of the dessert items ordered was divine. If you eat outside, I recommend facing the restaurant as it is more pleasant than the building across the way.
I've eaten here often. I love the atmosphere and the sculptures.  Julio is my favorite waiter.  Always a smile on his face.
Found this restaurant by chance.  I didn't even know it was there - at the end of Sheridan in Palo Alto.  The ambiance is so inviting, from the twinkling white lights, to the fountain and statues to the art on the walls.  The menu is Italian and Sicilian - the seafood pastas were excellent.  Some of the lightest calamari I ever ate and still trying to figure out the aioli.  Some of the best tiramisu I have tasted.  The food was delicious without being too rich.  The coffee with dessert was good and strong.  The staff were friendly, responsive and courteous.  I will definitely be going back.
Hubby and I had dinner here on Saturday night (along with several other couples).  It was a beautiful evening, and we loved the dining experience on the patio!  The food was great - I had the gnocchi and my husband had the salmon ravioli - we were both happy.  The wine was good - Barbera from Italy - and the almond gelato was creamy and delicious.  Our waiter, Guisseppi, was attentive and entertaining.  Overall, a very good experience.
Caffe Riace is the yummiest hidden gem in Palo Alto. I love the ambiance with the outdoor patio with the trees and indoor is just as romantic with beautiful murals painted on the walls. You literally feel like you are being teleported into Italy. Building on the wonderfl ambiance, the service is amazing! Very attentive staff, with a perfect balance of upscale dining and Sunday dinner at grandma's house. But, only if your grandma is the most amazing traditional sicilian cook. The food is great! I loved the bread, their wine selection is great and the sicilian salad with oranges  and pork chop were perfection. Great date night, boys!!
Great setting, wonderful service, mediocre menu and food. The hostess who sat us was less than friendly and seemed almost annoyed that we stopped by for lunch. On the other hand, our waiter was AMAZING. One of the best I've had in a loooong time. The restaurant itself is a real hide-away, you'd be unlikely to find it on your own as it's tucked neatly away in the middle of some office buildings. The food looked nice but lacked real flavor and punch. You won't rave about it, but it's edible. This would be a great place for appetizers and a glass of wine. Not sure what it's like at night but they have heaters for the patio and if they have lights, I'm sure the ambiance is just fantastic.
Overrated, overpriced, and overly, overtly pretentious.  Perhaps they've changed in the last year, but it seems just too perfectly catered to the Palo Altan who favors ambience over taste and value. Bring your BMW, and talk loudly about your last trip to a cute little villa in Milan.  Cell phones mandatory.
It was a beautiful summer evening for dinner in the courtyard.  The sun was in our eyes for a while but with shades, we were ok.  The restaurant is situated in a mixed use neighbourhood as it is flanked by commercial property on one side, and condos on the other; in fact it sits on the ground floor of the condo property.  The Italian wines we had were 4 and 5 stars.  Service was good and fast enough.  Food was plentiful, good but not divine enough for 4 or 5 stars. A waiter (or perhaps it was their owner / chef) came by and offered us couple of appetizers that was apparently a wrong order for another table.  We thought it was a freebie, but the bill said otherwise.  That was a little strange.
Good food.  Service is a little slow but staff is extremely nice.
Came here with the whole extended family for my brothers pre wedding day dinner experience.  So we had something like 20 people and I guess during the reservation making experience we thought that the tables would be somehow more conducive to mingling table to table.  Instead we got three tables, granted they were next to each other, but seated outside (I think we requested that, not sure though...) with some massive massive corporate event going on (lots of martini glasses, no real martini drinkers) it was too loud to hear our own table let alone lean over and chat with people at the next table.  I did like the pseudo greek/roman pleasure garden feel of the seating area, and it made me feel like someone should have been dangling grapes into my mouth while I reclined on a marble sofa.  Sadly that did not happen. The food was good.  I am of the opinion that Italian food is usually pretty good, and doesn't really get that much better the more fancy you get.  This place (although I have no idea what we paid, cause it was some sort of fixed price menu) looked like it cost quite a bit, and the food was certainly presented as if it was uber fancy, but in the end it was just good. I can't remember the entirety of what  I ate (too much drinking both at the restaurant and prior to arriving), but at some point it involved pasta and maybe some chicken.  I seem to recall enjoying the free bread thing, and the appetizers, but my main seemed fairly bland and uninspired (chicken parmigana at a fancy place, okay....) In the end I will not be returning, because the prices are almost certainly too high and the food is just mediocre enough that they can get away with it for the masses. However, I will say that it is a pretty good spot for groups, just double check to see how intimate your setting will be (ask if they have any open bar corporate events going in the same spot that you are having your dining experience)
Went to Caffe Riace recently for a gal's night out to celebrate a friend's birthday. It really is a gem of a restaurant. The outdoor patio is delightful and our server, Kent, was terrific ~ he made excellent food and wine recommendations and the banter was fun too.  And the food, oh, the glorious food.... I'm still dreaming about the Penne Norma and their incredible Spinach salad. You don't want to miss it!
ambiance, clever decor and attentiveness upon arrival made us think that we were going to have a great experience.  they have a more than respectable wine selection and the service was attentive throughout.  unfortunately the food is solid execution but nothing to write home about.  we were served family style given the nature of the group that we had and this was something of a disappointing experience.  the portions were anemic and the execution spotty. 1-on-1 the execution is solid and the accompanying reviews seem to be pretty much spot on.  while there's much to commend this place. i wouldn't go out of my way to seek it out.
atmospheric patio for enjoying an evening dinner with a nice bottle of red in the summertime. i came here years ago for a birthday celebration with a rather large group and recall being treated very well despite the fact we kept adding seating at the last minute and couldn't make up our minds about what to order. the last time i came here (in summer 2010), this wonderful, personable server by the name of "joe" (i forget what it was an abbreviated version of.. guliano? guiseppe? yes, guiseppe!) waited on us and he really set the bar high when it came to service. he had the table laughing and even while a dish or two could have used a bit more spice/salt, we just didn't mind b/c joe seemed to go out of his way to ensure we had everything our hearts and stomachs desired (eg:cannelloni or osso bucco? decisions, decisions). without fail, i _ALWAYS_ get the cannelloni here. there's usually push back from friends when they find out it's served w/o meat but with cannelloni this divine, i could possibly give up meat ... for a week. 3.5 stars for their cannelloni and since i haven't tried any of the other entrees here :/
We went here with friends for dinner. We had a reservation but were told  that it'd be a 15 minute wait when we arrived on time. Then we were seated at a circular table that was way too big for our party of 4 - made it really difficult to have an intimate meal. The best thing we had that night was the wine, which was amazing. The appetizers were so-so, more fast food quality than fine dining. We were kept waiting for over an hour to get our main course. I had the lamb shank which was cold by the time it arrived and bland and tasteless - the worst I've ever had. The others in my party didn't think much of their entrees either. Dessert was pre-prepped and not fresh. The only saving grace was the service - our server was funny and entertaining but couldn't make up for a disastrous dining experience. We will not be back.
Homemade pasta and cozy atmosphere. Ideal for a date night. Solid, but standard, Italian food.
I would drive back from Sacramento for the gnocchi!  We were seated promptly, in a private and romantic section.  The food was delicious and clearly fresh.  You might need GPS to find the front (look for the courtyard) and a guide to find your way out, but you will certainly find your way there again!
We've tried this place three times and are not going back.  The awesome atmosphere does not make up for the average food and the horrible service.  Our wait staff have been nice, but soooooo slow.  (A small side note...We went once with our three year old and ordered plain penne pasta and were charged $15.  Totally ridiculous.)
I just wanted to say that the owner and the servers are priceless! I totally recommend this place for bridal showers, meetings etc....The food is to die for not generic at all..REAL ITALIAN FOOD!  Great wine! We go there for lunch and dinner and....had my bridal shower there and we had our own private area with great service!  Giuseppe your the best!! Angel
Riace's is a wonderful place to slow down and dine at one's leisure. Since the lovely out-door seating is very welcoming on a lovely sultry evening, everyone has room and elbow space so that conversations can be had without yelling over a din. Our group of 4 each started with tasty appetizers like the Caprese salad and carbonera style spaghetti, and went on to very flavorful and well prepared entrees, like the parmigiana and bolognese. We ended the evening with their home-made desserts and left feeling pleasantly full, and happily content.  The dishes were expertly prepared and served. Riace's team of professionals treats you like family!  I love the food and atmosphere there. It's a hidden gem and worth the drive up from San Jose.
Beautiful Ambiance, Excellent Dinner, Outstanding service...this restaurant truly reminds me of when I was in Italy.  They even kept a smile on my 5-year old's face (not really for kids, but we really wanted to go).
Food was very good, and the owner's son came to the table to chat.  Friendly to a fault.  Very small, but cozy.  Classic italian food, presented well and cooked perfectly.
This was my first return to Cafe Riace after many visits over the years. The service was outstanding from our server Julio Herrera and every dish was a delightful combination of ingredients that mixed the tastes of Italy and California. The cafe has a lovely outdoor dining space amidst fountains and statuary. There is also an indoor dining area near the kitchen that is decorated in a European motif. The wine list is quite extensive and reasonable in price. All in all, this is a truly outstanding dining experience in a lovely setting in Palo Alto.
We came here for a birthday dinner and had a fantastic time. We had a big group so of course, not all of us showed up on time. However, the restaurant people were patient and helped us set our beautiful long table right outside right by the water fountain. From the appetizer to the entree to the yummy pistachio gelato. Everyone in our party were raving about their dinner. I ordered the clams linguine and tried the husband's dish which was the Pasta Penne. WOW the sauce in this pasta dish is DELISH! I will definitely order this again on my next trip here. Overall, we had a great experience here.
This is my favorite restaurant.  I eat here at least twice a week.  Its comfort to me.  To eat fabulous food, drink great wine, have great service from people that treat you better then family, and eat in the beautiful outdoors among fountains- This is the reason I moved to CA.  If you get Julio as your server - trust him...he'll bring you all the best...with a smile.
I love eating at Caffe Riace Ristorante Italiano. The ambivalence is wonderful and the food is excellent. They ghave an outstanding wine list. Unfortunately the service is sometimes a little slow and even when reminded the waiter said the kitchen was backed up? We waited an hour to receive our salad.
Food, service and atmosphere were all excellent. Tables could be a little bigger for a better dining experience but overall loved everything. Will be back for sure.
Food, service and atmosphere were all excellent. Tables could be a little bigger for a better dining... Read more 
Unimaginative, highly priced, average food made without an ounce of love. The restaurant's only saving grace is a comfortable and interestingly decorated dining room but that's not enough to make me go back.
Nothing beats a nice day out and hearty italian food with wonderful service.  Arguably one of the most romantic spots in Palo Alto.  Single ladies, be careful of the young owner.  He is a mac daddy.  Watching him work is a thing of beauty.
We had a company lunch on the Cafe Riace patio yesterday. The patio was really nice. The food was good, but not great. The service was a bit slow. Overall it was a nice lunch, but there are better places to eat in Palo Alto for sure.
Beautiful exterior. You are seated outside next to the water if you are lucky(fills up quickly). The ambience is just awesome. The service was exceptional. People kept checking on us and refilled water , drinks etc. Servers were helpful with suggestions and the food was exceptional. We are vegetarians and found quite a few options. I would definitely not categorize it as casual dining. This is a place you would want to go dressed up. I savored every minute i was here. Will definitelt go back.
Went there last night with Mom & J.  The ladies enjoyed it much more than I did. I had the Peperoni arrostiti (roasted peppers) and found it extremely bland.  J had the Siciliana salad, and she really enjoyed it. For the entrees, Mom had the steak special, and she practically licked her plate clean.  J had the Spaghetti Carrettiera- it was a HUGE portion, and she took half of it home.  I had the Salmon, and again found it bland.  I asked for some hot pepper, and I was offered a the house special hot sauce which had habaneros in it.  Now, that was delicious! Overall, I much prefer Renzo's or even "Pasta?".  I would not go back.
I have had many special celebrations here with friends and family. For a few hours, you feel as if you were transposed to Italy and sitting in a real piazza. This is a family-run place and you will often see the owners sitting at the table next to you while the sons are managing the restaurant and taking your order. Everyone is really friendly and hospitable, at times, they have treated our table to some free dessert wine or tiramisu. The gnocchi is to die for.
The food was pretty good and the ambiance was nice. My boyfriend and I went pretty late on a Wednesday night for dinner and it was still somewhat crowded. I wanted to enjoy the patio outside because I had heard that it was nice in the evenings with the outdoor heaters, but it seemed that everything was going on indoors, so the waiter seated us inside. The food was pretty good. Here's what we ordered: Arancine Siciliane- These risotto balls were nice (and different because I had never tried them before), but nothing extraordinary. The presentation was neat, but something was a little off.. Spinaci e Funghi- This was really good. Portions were kind of small, but still very very tasty. Cannelloni della Mamma- I love ricotta cheese, so I thought this pasta dish was good and not too heavy. Salmon Riace- Salmon was cooked right, but other than that, nothing special about it. The free bread that they give you to start off your meal is really good. They give it to you with this olive/EVOO dip that is soo good, I nearly got full off of the bread before our entrees came out! Definitely a nice place to try and I really liked that it was kind of hidden away, but close to Stanford's campus. Probably wouldn't have ever discovered it if it weren't for the online deal that we got for the place (can't remember if it was Groupon or OpenTable), but I'm glad we were able to try it!
I was in Palo Alto for business and spent a terrific night here.  I am always on the lookout for great outdoor spaces to dine, and this place was fabulous.  Although the location is really tucked away, when we walked in, it felt like we were transported to Italy.  Some of the big statues seemed a bit over the top for Palo Alto, but the place has vision, that's for sure!  The food was stellar...I've never had more perfectly cooked polenta, all carmelized on the outside, creamy goodness within, with tons of flavor...my lamb was scrumptious,veggies perfectly cooked, all in all a fantastic plate of food.  The tables are almost too big though for parties of 4, it seemed like we were too far apart.  The wine list is huge, a little overwhelming, but I persevered and we found a great bottle of Syrah.  The next time I'm in town, I'll be back!
What a fun night!!! Great food, fun service and a sweet place to dine. Osso Bosso a stand out.
I too am not sure why this place only gets 3.5 stars. Just so you know where I'm coming from, my idea of good Italian is Olive Garden.  We went here when a friend couldn't use a Groupon dinner coupon that expired that night.  It was a delicious meal! The bread and olive oil starter was amazing (and I hate dipping bread in olive oil, but the olive mixture in the oil was really good).  We ordered the risotto balls and they were okay, but I don't think we would get them again.  The bread/oil was better (and free). My husband ordered the special (roast pork with a cherry and fig sauce, and a spinach/mushroom risotto).  He said it was just okay, but he would try something else next time. My first choice (linguini carbonara) wasn't on the menu and my second choice (gnocchi pesto) was sold out, so I went with the cannelloni, and that was a fantastic choice.  The sauce made the whole dish (try dipping the bread into it)!  I would get this entree again in a heartbeat, and with the appetizer, the two large cannelloni were too much food, so I brought one home for lunch tomorrow. We got the chocolate mascarpone for dessert, and while it was a small serving, it was very good. Overall, it was an excellent meal and we would go back.  Total for our meal (no drinks) was $65 before tip.
2 stars for the ambiance.  Otherwise, the food was pretty bad (I had the salmon and it had no flavor whatsoever, other than the very sour lemons on it).
This place can be a little hard to find as it's located in the middle of a business part of sorts, but it's worth the trouble. Cafe Riacce is 100% outdoor dining, so go when the weather is nice. The atmosphere is wonderful --with a huge fountain and greenery all around. The menu offers classic California Italian fare and they have an extensive drink menu. This place is great for a romatic dinner or gathering with a group of friends.
My manager brought us here for a work lunch, and I loved it!  Judging by the way he was greeted by the owner, I'm thinking he's a regular...?Anyway, the food was delicious and the service couldn't have been better. And the atmosphere was so nice.  I didn't want to go back to work (well, that's every day).
I used to host here, and don't go anywhere else for great Italian!! Don't go here if you're on a budget or a diet. :) But do go there if you want to feel like you're dining in a sweet Italian cafe! Get the Cannelloni!!! (spelling??)
Solid Italian place, and a favorite for a first date.  Things to know: * Almost all outdoor seating.  Go if the weather is nice.  If it's busy, it can be hard to get a seat near a heat lamp. * Food is solid.  It's not amazing (certainly not for the price), but solid. * They generally have one premium Italian wine available by the glass.  My last visit it was a Barolo.  Visit before that, it was a Brunello!  Don't think I've ever seen a Brunello by a glass before. * Even people in Palo Alto usually haven't heard of it.  I strongly avoid taking a first date (or second or third) to anything on University Ave because it's so cliche.  Caffe Riace shows some local knowledge.  I've probably taken more first dates here than anywhere else.
Fun atmosphere!  The outdoor seating is really quaint, with giant sculptures, a fountain, and lights all around.    The food is pretty rich--they actually fill the gnocchi with cheese--but if you're in the mood for it, it really hits that tomato-cream-carb-cheese spot.  Overall, a good place for a celebration...not the best Italian food I've ever had, but the atmosphere definitely makes it a charmer.
Featuring good food at a reasonable price as well as large portions, Riace is tucked away in an obscure neighborhood a few blocks away from California Avenue.  The wait staff is excellent and both indoor and outdoor seating areas are well decorated.
Very romantic despite the fact that it's situated in an office complex.  The seating is mostly outside in their courtyard, so it's a great place to go on a warm summer night.  A very friendly, family run restaurant.
Amazing food and perfect setting for relaxing with a glass of wine (or 3 or 4!)  Lunch can be a bit crowded but dinner is not as crowded - we were able to get a table with no wait on a beautiful Saturday night.
The outdoor setting is lovely and romantic, especially on a balmy summer night.  Unfortunately, the food is average and the service is disorganized.  Mostly you are paying for the nice atmosphere.
Very tasty pasta dishes. The sausage is house made and delicious.  The veal Marsala was excellent, tender with a smooth rich sauce.
This used to be my favorite place about 10 years ago.  Their quality has dropped as they have grown.  I no longer see the same level of coziness / ambience they had (as they spread across the entire courtyard), or quality of food.  At the same time prices have gone up considerably.  My favorite dish here is the pasta carbonara and the home-made gelato.  Decent place, but not value for money.
I finally got to go to Cafe Riace, which has been on my local bucket list for awhile. The outdoor seating is beautiful, and it really is a hidden gem in Palo Alto. The food is amazing - authentic Italian cuisine at its finest. Cafe Riace is an upscale restaurant but they make you feel like "la familia." The owner is fantastic - very personable guy who makes you feel like you're from the neighborhood. The wine list is extensive and the desserts are incredible.  A great place to go for birthdays, a night out with friends, or Valentine's Day. Can't wait to go back in the summer and sit outside on a beautiful evening with a nice glass of merlot. Buon appetito...
Ask for the lemon gelato. It's like an iPod in dessert form. You'll see what I mean.
I used to come here once in a while, but I think my most recent trip will be my last.  The food was mediocre at best, the service was weak, and the price was still high.  The atmosphere is great, but at what cost.  There are many better italian restaurants in palo alto
Linguine Tutto Mare and fresh bread were excellent. The Arrancine and Bistecca were just OK. Waiter was very friendly but could not figure out which dishes belonged to us or another table (and this went on throughout the meal). I also sent a note through Open Table that we were celebrating our Anniversary, and there was absolutely zero acknowledgement - a little glass of champagne or a dessert would have been a nice touch, but just welcoming us with a "Happy Anniversary" would have been nice and wouldn't have cost them anything.
A little oasis in the middle of Palo Alto... The outdoor garden is dreamy... wonderfully decorated with random/unusual/eclectic decor... The wine list is a bit pricey and the food is quite good.
Good gnocchi and olive pate.  Awesome friendly service.  Loved the out-door seatings (if it's not too sunny out).
Wonderful Sicilian food, outside seating, great service, casual
Also very few health code violations! http://www.decadeonline....
I have to update my review. I gave it 3 stars last time and now I'll have to give them 2. The food is not as good as it used to be. I've eaten here quite a few times because my work has hosted a couple of events here. It's also just around the corner from where I work so I take friends there when they come to have lunch with me. I have had a few dishes there  that have been just OKAY but he best thing on the menu is the  Cannelloni Della Mama. I could probably eat an entire pan of it!!! However, the last time I ate there, they told me they didn't have mama's cannelloni anymore. I'm not sure if that was temporary or not but it's the only thing I like on the menu. I'd recommend this place only if you are going because you want to drink a cocktail outside in nice surroundings.
interesting statues, cute outdoor seating, and friendly service for lunch on a sunday. but the food is on the mediocre side. i got the linguine tutto mare which was featured in a yelp photo and looked good. but on taste disappointing... not enough flavors to warrant an outstanding dish. and the bread was rubber-bandery.  :(
Great food, fantastic wine selection. You have to try the fresh mozzarella.
It's a long way from SF, but it's the best Sicilian kitchen in the area, beautiful setting, great people.
No thank you.  Less than mediocre food.  I think people come here for the 'outdoor' ambience.
Cafe Riace is great for lunch on a sunny (but not too hot) day.  The outdoor seating and ambiance makes lunch there very enjoyable.  The Antipasto Riace was good (comes with a mix of items).  I ordered a pappardelle in some sort of cream sauce and thought it was really good (chewy and very rich).
I love Cafe Riace. Their tiramisu is delish and their mozzarella is out of this world. You'll find that they have mostly outdoor dining, which isn't appealing during winter, but they have lots of heat lamps. I've found the wait staff to be considerate and the owner is adorable. He's a VERY affectionate older gentleman who will take good care of you if you give him a hug and a kiss.
The statues are worth seeing at Caffe Riace.  Greek men with everything they were born with showing for all the world to see.  The food is good, but not excellent, a great place to take clients or your department out to lunch at.
This place is a great hidden spot. During the summers the outside patio is packed during lunch. It's a great place to escape your office to enjoy some sunshine. Everyone here that has served us has been Italian, which gives it that little extra something. The food is always tasty and is the wine. Last time we had the Pasta Ceppo Riace - very good and the Salsiccia Siciliana (good as well) and some kind of tortellini special for that night. The tortellini was amazing - truffles inside, chunks of prosciutto in the sauce...MMMMM. Makes me want some right now...the only draw back to this place is that it is in the middle of nowhere Palo Alto so don't expect a vibrant atmosphere in the evening.
Great informal italian bistro with courtyard outside seating.
This is my favorite place to eat in Palo Alto. If you want to relax on a hot day, stop by for gelato.
Great atmosphere... and that's about the only nice thing I can say about this place. The food is Olive Garden quality.  OK, maybe a little better, but at $25-$30 per place, COME ON!  They could do a lot better.  The food is pretty bland; if it's good it is only because it is smothered in some cream sauce, or has a lot of sausage in it.  In my book, that's cheating :) The service was mediocre too.  I think they were understaffed in the kitchen the night I was there, since I saw other tables complaining about how long it took to get their food too.  Other than the food taking long, our waiter was adequate, if a little aloof.  Again, nothing awful, but for the price, much worse than you'd expect. If you want to go out to a nice Italian restaurant in Palo Alto, check out Cafe Pro Bono instead.
While Caffe Riace has a lovely outdoor seating area and a great wine list, I was unimpressed with the food. The wine was delicious... I wish I could say the same about the food!  We ordered a variety of dishes for our large group - antipasto dish (on the recommendation of the waiter), Polenta with Gorgonzola, Insalata Caprese, Gnocchi, Pasta a la Norma, etc.  The only two dishes that were repeatable were the Polenta and the bread that came out ahead of the dishes.  The others were just so-so - pretty bland and Americanized.  And the blood-orange gelato was terrible!! I don't think I'll be going back...
Great place tucked in a tiny patio of an high end apartment building. Lovely location with outdoor seating, fire, water and fountains! Perfect date night restaurant. The wine list is amazing --- no one will be disappointed. A great Italian restaurant in the area.
Nice outdoor dining area, great wine selection and great food.
If you are looking for great food at a good location for a reasonable price..  look no further!!  Caffe Riacce is one of my favorites.  Authentic Italian food!  Everything on the menu is fantastic and well prepared.  The staff are extremely friendly and service is always the best.  My meals there are always flavorful and served hot.  I have never left unhappy.  They have an excellent wine selection complimenting there lunch and dinner menu.  All of their desserts are home made...  including the gelato!
Came here with a http://restaurant.com coupon really early in the evening (about 5 PM). Didn't get acknowledged or seated for 10 min. or so, even though it was empty. That's the only thing I can say was wrong with the place though. After that, the service was excellent. Our table had the lentil soup, lamb ravioli, chicken parmesan and the gnocci. We were all really happy with the dishes. They did take awhile to show up at the table but I enjoyed the time to relax and enjoy the scenery. Not to mention the delicious bread that came with olive tapenade. The food seemed really fresh, not like the premade pasta dishes from other "italian restaurants". It was pricey but the coupon helped. Will definitely be back.
Great place for lunch on a beautiful day! Outside seating was all taken so we ate "inside" right by the door so we were able to enjoy the nice weather. Can't wait to go back and try more items.
Horrible service!! From the moment we sat we were continuosly asked whether we wanted some wine...and asked why we were saying no...after all, their selection was so good but we didn't feel like drinking... They are sooooo pushy that it is clear their trying to make you spend as much money as they can. The place doesn't seem to get much people lately... Anyway, we weren't starving so we went straight to the entrees: I had a Carbonara and my friends had gnocchi with pesto and linguini with fish. Everything tasted horrible! And let me tell you, that's the most american of italian food. I have been in Italy and in so many others italian restaurants and the food tasted like the one they are trying to sell you on Columbus avenue in SF. What really made me upset came after we were done with the entrees. The waiter came in, took our plates and asked whether we wanted a dessert: we all said that we were full and to please bring the check in and he replied :" What do you mean? You don't like our food?" But we just said we were full...could you please bring the f....g check in????? He finally did, it took them 20 minutes to swipe my card. I went home and had a terrible night trying to digest the food.
Found this through http://restaurant.com - excellent find!  Wouldn't have found it otherwise, since it is in a strange little location off California Ave's business district. Great wine list, good simple food, very good service, slightly pricey.
After several pleasant dining experiences here over the years, three months ago we had our first terrible experience at this restaurant, which has a lovely outdoor setting. While some of the dishes were clearly subpar (two of four entrees were returned to the kitchen), much of our discontent then revolved around our inept waiter, Violet, who clearly belonged at a Denny's. She did not know the menu, nor the wines, and any time she came to the table she interrupted the conversation. We tried the place again tonight. Much to my chagrin, we got Violet again, and she was just as raw and unskilled this time as she was three months ago. Why would an expensive restaurant keep such an unskilled waiter? Along with me, all our guests wondered the same thing. After many familiar miscues (including interrupting conversation), she came to the table after our dinner and asked if we wanted dessert. "Well," I said, "how could we know that since you haven't given us the dessert menus?" As I said, unbelievable. When we came home, I called the restaurant to talk to the manager. Guess what? Violet is the manager! This unbelievable development leads me to two conclusions: one, she is very close to the owner and/or the owner's family (else how to explain such a preposterous hiring?) and therefore complaining will not accomplish anything, and two, we will not be having dinner here again, which is too bad because we live in nearby Menlo Park and would love to come to this setting to dine. As for the food? Passable pasta. Terrible osso bucco. Okay Caesar's salad. Good gelato. All and all, this obviously mismanaged place is not worth the bill ($200 for four). My suggestion: Go to a museum if you want to see heroic nude statues.
After several pleasant dining experiences here over the years, three months ago we had our first... Read more 
I was so disheartened to read so many lackluster reviews about a restaurant that I have loved for many years!  Granted, I have not been to Riace in some time, so it is entirely possible that the service and quality have diminished since I frequented the place.  My favorite memories of Riace are long, leisurely lunches and dinners when the weather is just right.  I've always had good food at Riace.  I am partial to the Canelloni alla Nonna and I'm generally pleased with their pasta specials.  I agree with other reviewers that the atmosphere and the weather contribute greatly to the experience.  I for one lament the inexplicable lack of outdoor dining options in an area that has such great weather for so much of the year, so this is a great pick for a romantic meal on a warm summer's night.  If you get to know the regular staff, you'll probably be more foregiving of the "slow" service.  It's certainly not the place to go if you're in a hurry.  Riace is clearly not for everyone, but it's one of my favorites.
The service was unbelievably rude. From the moment we walked in and were seated, we were ignored. Our food took 45 minutes to an hour to arrive, and was very mediocre. When we tried to tell the waiter about one particularly horrible dish (very kindly) he said he would take it off the bill and then did not. When we tried to just get his attention to pay the bill, he avoided us. We eventually asked to speak with the manager and we were scoffed and laughed at. No respectable, high class restaurant would treat people this way. Don't go-waste of money, time, and energy.
i like it. eat good. breath air fresh is good too in the same way as the eat.
I've been going here for 10 years now and I have never been disappointed. It is especially beautiful on a hot summer day and you feel like you're actually in Italy! I would also save room for dessert the hazelnut gelato is to die for. In fact whenever I go my dad begs me to some how bring him some home!
Wonderful food, friendly staff and great atmosphere.  perfect for when you want something a little bit nicer than the usual, but still casual.
3 stars for food, 4 for the ambiance. The outdoor seating area is pretty awesome.
this used to be one of my favorite places several years ago. the ambience is one of a kind - you are transported to a piazza complete with murals and water fountains and the wine list fabulous. however, the food quality has gone down over the last 3-4 yrs. with so many other good italian options around, the ambience is just not enough to make up for the high prices on average food.
First off the food was really good, even though I could see it at all. I was astounded at how a place could have such a great location, and good food, but have the worst lighting ever. Reading the menu was a real challenge to do with one tiny candle on the table. Then when the food arrived I had a hard time figuring out what exactly I was eating. It was a fun experience, and I will laugh about it for years to come with my GF. However I don't think we will go spend our money to eat in the dark again. someone at this restaurant needs to get a clue.
I attended a group affair at Riace's, mostly an outdoor cafe quietly tucked between an office building and an apartment building.  I'd never been there before and was delighted by the ambiance--- the Fiat near the entrance, a large whimsical fountain of a woman holding a spouting washing machine instead of the traditional jug, and giant replica statues of Greek warriors.  I was curious about the name Riace and was told the cafe was named after the site where two ancient Greek bronze statues were found by a scuba diver in 1972 ( for those interested in the history check out: http://en.wikipedia.org/... ).   We arrived before sunset on a warm day and enjoyed the onset of a lovely evening.  Heating lamps disguised as palm trees kept us warm as dusk turned to evening. Even though most of the dining is outdoors there's intimate indoor dining as well.  Definitely 5 stars for the unusual ambiance. The owners serve up authentic Italian food from recipes brought with them from Sicily.  Everything I tried was delicious from the Antipasto Riace (combination of bruschetta,  caprese (fresh mozzarella layered with fresh tomato, basil, sweet onion, and capers), and melanzane (eggplant) and roasted peppers, to the house salad of mixed greens and fresh herbs with olive oil and balsamic vinegar, to the Penne Siciliana made with organic baby spinach, fresh tomatoes and homemade sausage (an old family recipe).  The chicken was fresh and tender served with olives, fresh tomatoes and capers. The wine was delicious, although I can't say what it was as it was poured for us.  I learned they have an extensive wine list.   I'm not  a wine connoisseur ---I only know what I like and don't like----and I definitely savored the red wine we were served. I loved the desserts!  I tasted all three.  They make their own including the gelato.  I had the chocolate hazelnut--- totally addicting!  The cannoli shells were light and crisp and the filling not too heavy or too sweet.  And the tiramisu was superb. All in all, it was a wonderful evening with great food!  A place to relax and enjoy, and one I'll be returning to! Buon Appetito!
My family and I used call Caffe Riace one of our favs.  I definitely would have given it a 4star rating in past times.  Recently to send off my youngest son to college we went to CR.  We ordered some favorites and a few specials (there were six of us).  We sat inside their newish dining room which was pleasant and warm.  However, the food was very long in coming (45 minutes at least, prolly more like and hour and a little)  And there was only one table of two before us (they didn't seem happy either).  And then a largish party walked in (12 or so).  And when our food came, sigh, what a disappointment!  My salmon was dry, tough and over cooked.  In fact the whole of our meals seemed to have been sitting under the warmer and over cooked.  We were too hungry by that time and ate...VERY mediocre food!  We didn't recognize any of the wait staff or the manager.  Usually the owner is there and we chat or chat with the waiter.  These people were all new.  Which leads us to wonder if the restaurant changed hands.   All the food even our old favorites ended up tasting a notch below Olive Garden at well above Olive Garden prices.  I will have to make sure this wasn't just a fluke, because this WAS one of our family celebration locations.  It would be sad to lose it!!!   A very bad and disappointing experience.  P.S. we ended up going somewhere else for dessert as not to continue the sadness.
We had dinner there last Friday night and had a lousy meal, slow and harried service and still paid $100. That is NOT a deal. Any Italian restaurant that serves gooey, overcooked pasta should not be visited again. My husband's sausage pasta tasted like they used jarred garlic paste--very acidic and bitter. My calamari was well-cooked but overly sauced and very messy looking. My daughter's gnocchi was overcooked and pastey...shall I go on? Our server was pleasant but everwhere else but at our table and the sunglasses and high-heels wearing hostess was zipping around seating people, pouring drinks while an owner/manager sat and drank wine with a table of four. And I can't just chalk it up to a bad night--there was too much wrong for this place to ever be worth visiting again. It is absolutely tragic that you pay what you do in our town and get crappy, overcooked pasta, while enduring such wretched service. I would have loved to ask for my money back, if I could have grabbed the server. Maybe I should have sat with the manager and at least had a drink.
My husband and I went for dinner and we had a really nice time.  Beautiful ambiance and attentive service.  The food was average, which is why I didn't give a five, but the atmosphere made up for the so-so dishes.  Very romantic place!
I threw a surprise birthday party for my wife last night at Caffe Riace, and the staff at this restaurant hit a home run.  To begin with, we were greeted by a hostess that was ready and willing to happily play along with the surprise.  They had set a side a special room where our guests were set up with drinks while they waited for our arrival.  After the surprise, we were moved to an area where a group of tables had been prepared and set aside for our party.  A drinks table was set up next to our area, and appetizers were served.  We had ample time to visit, and when the food was served it was excellent.  Finally, there was no rush to get us out.  They were only too happy to have us stay as long as we wanted.
3.5stars. the foods barely better than average here, but the fresh homemade pasta, creative menu and great ambiance satisfies enough for least three stars. i would actually boost it to four for the exceptional service but its a little pricey - so i think you should expect that.
Can't emphasize not just how over rated this place is but also wrongfully rated.  My husband, a friend and I went to this place this past Sunday because of a great rating and found this place to be soooooo inept that we could not understand the awesome rating this place received.  For starter, let's talk about the price:  $107+20 tip for 3 entree, 2 salads and two glass of wine.....for three is definitely not cheap nor is it super expensive.  However, for the price, I should not have to eat boiled chicken.    The chicken marsala dish was swimming in sweet marsala sauce; the chicken tomato sauce dish had great fresh tomatoe sauce, but the chicken had no taste; the organic salad was too salty, but  great sweet tomatoes; and the pasta side dish that came with this seemed out of place for fine italiam dining.  The past was rubbery, oily, and hard.....The basic of great italian restaurant needs to know how to cook al dente pastas.  This place was upscale cute, but come on, I'm here for fine dining/food...I could not find it anywhere.  Perhaps the main chef was gone for the evening.
